UNITED  STATES  COMPETITIVENESS  THROUGH 

BASIC  RESEARCH 

S.  HRG.  110–1197 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND 

INNOVATION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

APRIL  19,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

78–569 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE,  TECHNOLOGY,  AND  INNOVATION 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 19, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Ensign  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Bement, Jr., Dr. Arden L., Director, National Science Foundation  .....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Jeffrey,  Dr.  William  A.,  Director,  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Tech-
nology, Technology Administration, U.S. Department of Commerce  ...............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Marburger  III,  Dr.  John,  Director,  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy, 
Executive Office of the President  ........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Mark Pryor to: 

Dr. William A. Jeffrey  ......................................................................................
Dr. John Marburger III  ....................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Kay  Bailey  Hutchison  to: 
Dr. Arden L. Bement, Jr.  .................................................................................
Dr. John Marburger III  ....................................................................................

Page 
1 
3 
5 
6 
1 
45 
47 
6 
10 

22 
23 

28 
30 

11 
13 

51 
51 

53 
52 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

UNITED  STATES  COMPETITIVENESS 

THROUGH  BASIC  RESEARCH 

THURSDAY,  APRIL  19,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND 
INNOVATION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:04 a.m. in room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. John F. Kerry, Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. This hearing will come to order. 
Good morning, thank you, all of our witnesses, for being here, we 

appreciate it very, very much. 

Everybody here understands what our basic research and innova-
tion  means  to  our  economy.  Fifty  percent  of  our  economic  growth 
in the last half century is due to scientific breakthroughs and tech-
nological  innovation.  And  most  of  our  productivity  comes  from  it. 
Our  competitors  know  this  also,  and  that’s  why  increasingly,  in 
other countries, they’ve been dedicating more and more of their re-
sources  to  compete  with  us,  and  some  of  them  are  catching  up.  In 
Europe, Japan, and China, there’s a very specific, intensive dedica-
tion to investments in science and engineering. 

We’re  here  today  because  we  believe  that  America  can  improve 
our  competitiveness  posture  through  basic  research,  and  ensuring 
that  our  students  remain  capable  of  advancing  the  fields  of  tech-
nology, science and engineering. 

Inexplicably,  the  Administration  has,  over  the  last  years,  elimi-
nated or cut funding for some of our most successful programs, and 
I’m  not  sure  why.  They  have  persisted  in  attempting  to  cut  funds 
for  the  highly  successful  Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership, 
and the Advanced Technology Program. 

Notwithstanding  scores  of  success  stories  that  have  been  gen-
erated  from  these  fairly  modest  Federal  investments.  There’s  a 
company  in  Massachusetts,  now  the  number  one  exporter  of  LCD 
displays  to  Japan,  which  used  an  ATP  partnership  to  create  jobs 
and  growth,  in  fact,  an  ATP  partnership  led  to  the  creation  of  the 
digital mammogram. 

In my judgment it makes no sense to cut a program that retains 
and  creates  high-paying,  high-tech  jobs,  when  we  know  that  Asian 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

2 

and  the  European  Community  are  implementing  large-scale,  long- 
range, R&D projects. 

The  bottom  line  is  that  a  national  budget  ought  to  reflect  your 
values  and  your  priorities,  but  the  choices  in  the  budget  today, 
many of us feel, will have a negative impact on our Nation’s ability 
to innovate and compete. 

Over  the  past  years,  we  have  had  the  opportunity  to  sustain 
American competitiveness in the world economy in a number of dif-
ferent  ways.  But  the  investments  have  not  supported  those  oppor-
tunities. 

I  don’t  suggest  that  Government  policy  can  or  should  single- 
handedly  dictate  events,  or  the  course  of  choices  in  the  market-
place.  We  had  that  debate,  probably  in  the  1980s  here  with  Presi-
dent  Reagan,  and  we  all  concluded  that  we’re  not  trying  to  pick 
winners,  and  we’re  not  trying  to  create  losers.  And  that’s  not  our 
role. 

But, clearly the impact of Government investment has been prov-
en  to  make  a  profound  difference  to  the  framework  within  which 
private sector choices are made. Perhaps, you know, one of the ob-
vious classic examples of that is the Internet itself, which came out 
of  Government  research.  The  private  sector  saw  the  opportunities 
and took it and ran with it. 

There  are  many  other  such  examples.  There  are  also  countless 
examples  of  mainstream  consumer  products  that  have  come  out  of 
Government  research  and  programs  themselves,  the  Space  Pro-
gram is a classic example of that. 

Personally, I join with those who put their faith in the American 
entrepreneur  and  the  American  worker.  But,  it  is  clear  that  other 
governments  are  leveraging,  to  the  greatest  degree  possible,  their 
opportunities  within  the  marketplace.  There  is  much  that  we  can 
do. 

I know that when I traveled, for instance, to Hong Kong and met 
with  our  foreign  commercial  service  personnel,  they  were  really 
frustrated  at  the  absence  of  a  significant  Federal  commitment  to 
their  ability  to  go  out  and  compete  for  the  RFPs  that  were  being 
presented by countries in the region. 

And,  indeed,  many  other  countries  were  providing  very  signifi-
cant  resources,  and  very  significant  physical  resources,  to  allow 
them  to  meet  with  different  parties,  and  it  was  their  conclusion, 
not  mine,  but  their  conclusion  that  we  were  losing  billions  of  dol-
lars of business as a consequence of our myopia. 

We’ve  heard  all  the  alarm  bells  sound  now.  Corporate  leaders 
like  Bill  Gates  have  called  our  high  schools  ‘‘obsolete’’  even  when 
they’re  working  perfectly.  I’ve  heard  from  executives  at  mid-sized 
manufacturing  firms  who  say  they’ve  cut  costs  dramatically,  but 
they  still  can’t  compete.  There  are  a  lot  of  different  ingredients  of 
that,  but  part  of  it  is  this  increasing  joint  venturing  that’s  taking 
place in a lot of countries in terms of basic research, science, tech-
nology, and even bringing products to market. 

Norm Augustine and his group from the National Academies say 
that our Nation risks falling behind, unless we make a comprehen-
sive investment in our scientific eco-system. 

This Committee, along with others in the Senate, has responded. 
Chairman Inouye, and Vice Chair Stevens have worked with other 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

3 

Committees to craft comprehensive competitiveness legislation. Our 
Subcommittee Ranking Member, Senator Ensign, has been a leader 
in this effort as well. I’ve joined as a cosponsor of this bill, and we 
expect floor consideration soon. 

The  bill  calls  for  increased  investments  in  basic  research,  NSF, 
at NIST and the Department of Energy. It also addresses the need 
for  better  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics  edu-
cation  from  kindergarten  through  graduate  school,  and  re-commits 
the Government to high-risk research. 

The  purpose  of  today’s  hearing  is  to  examine  the  budgets  and 
programs  of  our  Federal  science  agencies.  Before  us  are  the  Na-
tion’s preeminent science and technology agencies, and we welcome 
you here. You have broad expertise, and your programs, from nano-
technology and information technology to climate change and high- 
tech,  provide  important  opportunities  for  strengthening  the  Amer-
ican economy. 

Speaking of climate change, the world is finally awakening to the 
grave  threat  that  climate  change  poses.  When  major  corporations 
from  IBM  to  General  Electric,  Bruce  Petroleum,  3M,  DuPont,  Dow 
Chemical  and  others  are  all  calling  for  a  Government  response  to 
the  need  to  price  carbon,  and  to  begin  to  move  in  that  direction 
with greater technology, it’s significant. 

Rather  than  sit  idly  by,  as  I’m  afraid  the  Administration  has 
done  for  almost  7  years,  other  nations  have  taken  significant  ac-
tion,  and  are  reducing  their  fossil  fuel  consumption  and  carbon  di-
oxide  emissions.  We  need  to  challenge  ourselves  to  do  what  is  im-
portant  to  our  own  economic  future,  as  well  as  our  health,  safety, 
and security. 

There’s an enormous economic opportunity staring us in the face, 
and  others  are  more  aggressively  pursuing  that  than  we  are.  Wit-
ness  what  happened  with  photovoltaic  alternative  renewables,  and 
the  loss  of  our  lead  to  Japan  and  Germany,  because  we  basically 
refused to fuel the research that we committed to in the late 1970s. 
Companies that provide greener products, you can see it in Gen-
eral  Electric’s  ecoimagination  advertising,  you  can  see  it  in  their 
revenues,  with  more  efficient  batteries,  cleaner  engines,  more  effi-
cient appliances, and electronics that consume less, these are going 
to be the companies that prosper. 

Our  challenge  is  to  fund  research  and  development  that  can  en-
able  a  green  product  revolution  and  to  educate  the  students  who 
can invent, manufacture, and service these products. 

So, we look forward to hearing from our distinguished panel, Dr. 
Marburger,  the  Director  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology, 
thank  you  for  being  here,  doctor,  and  Dr.  Arden  Bement,  Director 
of  the  National  Science  Foundation,  and  Dr.  Bill  Jeffrey,  National 
Institute of Standards and Technology. 

Senator Ensign? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN ENSIGN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEVADA 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  this  im-
portant  hearing.  I’m  very  excited  that  our  competitiveness  bill  will 
be  on  the  floor,  very  soon.  Although  we  cannot  predict  the  exact 
timing,  whether  it  will  be  later  today,  tonight,  or  early  next  week 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

4 

sometime, the bottom line is that the full Senate will consider and 
hopefully pass our competitiveness bill very soon. 

A  lot  of  work  went  into  that  bill  last  year.  I  appreciate  Senator 
Inouye  working  with  Senator  Stevens  on  this  Committee,  as  well 
as  the  leaders  of  the  HELP  Committee,  and  the  Energy  Commit-
tees,  all  working  together  on  this  bill.  This  bill  is  really  one  of  the 
more  remarkable  work  products  that  has  come  out  in  a  bipartisan 
fashion in a long time. 

I was put in charge by Senator Frist last year, of trying to bring 
all of those groups together, and trying to just bring three Commit-
tees—forget  Republicans  and  Democrats—trying  to  bring  three 
Committees  together  to  work  on  the  same  product  and  actually 
come  up  with  something  that  all  three  of  the  Committee  chairmen 
and ranking members would cosponsor, as well as both of the lead-
ers, and then to bring virtually the same product back in this Con-
gress,  have  both  of  our  leaders  cosponsor  the  bill  and  bring  it  di-
rectly  to  the  floor  so  we  didn’t  have  to  go  through  more  machina-
tions  this  year,  it’s  very  exciting.  A  big  part  of  the  bill  is  what  we 
are here to discuss today, and that is addressing the basic research 
needs that we have in the United States. 

Anybody who looks at my record knows that I’m one of the most 
fiscally conservative people in the United States Senate. But there 
are places where the Federal Government can actually invest stra-
tegically,  to  where  you  get  huge  returns  in  tax  revenues  in  the  fu-
ture,  and  also  huge  economic  returns.  And,  there’s  no  better  place 
to look at that, than in high-risk, basic research. 

Since the mid-1990s, we have dramatically increased the funding 
levels in the life sciences, but we have not kept up those increases 
in  funding  levels  in  the  physical  sciences.  That  is  really  a  lot  of 
what  today’s  hearing  is  about,  hearing  from  all  of  you  folks  and 
getting direct testimony on this issue. 

Now,  we  have  to  make  sure  that  when  we’re  doing  this  that  we 
are  always  using  taxpayer  dollars,  in  the  way  that  maximizes  the 
benefit.  I  don’t  care  how  much  you  increase  science  budgets  by,  if 
you don’t use the dollars correctly, you will not get the appropriate 
bang  for  the  buck.  So  we  want  to  make  sure  that  as  we’re  going 
through  this  process  that  we  are  investing  in  those  types  of  re-
search  grants  that  have  the  potential  to  yield  the  most  results  in 
the long term. Of course, with any basic research, you never know 
what’s  going  to  be  the  end  result  of  the  research,  but  you  want  to 
have  the  processes  properly  set  up  and  in  place.  I  know  that  a  lot 
of  that  has  been  done  in  the  past,  but  we  want  to  continue  to 
streamline it, and improve it in ways where we invest in the types 
of research that have the potential to yield the most results. 

So,  I’m  excited  about  this  whole  process.  Basic  research  is  about 
keeping America competitive in the world. Basic research produces 
large amounts of jobs, as we go forward and then let the companies 
conduct  the  applied  research,  and  bring  exciting  products  to  the 
market.  We’re  not  saying  that  we  know  which  one  of  the  basic  re-
search projects that are being funded today is going to be the next 
disruptive  technology  of  the  future  that  is  going  to  totally  revolu-
tionize the economy. 

We just have no idea what specifically will emerge ‘‘out of basic’’ 
research conducted today. But companies in the private sector can-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

5 

not afford to fund that kind of basic research, really, only the Gov-
ernment can. So, I’m excited about today’s hearing, and working on 
this  project,  and  seeing  how  we  can  keep  America  competitive  in 
the 21st century. 

And  a  big  part  of  this—as  you’ve  mentioned,  Mr.  Chairman—is 
education.  You  know,  it’s  great  to  have  the  research,  but  if  we’re 
not, educating the next generation of engineers, if we’re not inspir-
ing young people then we will be in trouble. We have the finest col-
leges  and  universities  in  the  world.  People  from  all  over  the  world 
have  wanted  to  come  here.  Now,  that  is  changing.  Other  countries 
are  catching  up  to  us  even  in  the  university  setting,  but  we  still— 
at this point in time—have the finest universities in the world. 

Unfortunately,  in  Kindergarten  through  12th  grade,  we  do  not 
have  the  best  system  for  teaching  the  STEM  fields.  We’re  not  in-
spiring  our  young  people  to  love  math  and  science,  and  we’re  not 
doing  a  good  job  of  teaching.  We’ve  done  hearings  in  the  HELP 
Committee and in this Committee, on some of the things that we’re 
not  doing  right.  We  really  need  to  figure  out  how  to  improve  our 
STEM  education  for  the  future  of  our  American  workforce  and  so 
that  we  have  those  kinds  of  people  that  create  the  jobs  for  every-
body else. 

One  of  the  statistics  that  several  experts  mention  is  that  4  per-
cent  of  the  population  is  going  to  create  the  other  96  percent  of 
jobs.  A  lot  of  the  jobs  in  both  categories  are  in  the  science,  tech-
nology,  engineering  and  mathematics  fields,  and  so  we  have  to 
make sure that we are providing the kind of educational opportuni-
ties,  that  we  need  to  enable  American  students  to  succeed.  I  agree 
with  Bill  Gates,  we  have  to  dramatically  re-think  what  we  are 
doing  in  Kindergarten  through  12th  grade  to  get  our  children  on 
the right paths toward a bright educational future. 

So,  thanks  again,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  this  hearing  today. 
Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Ensign.  Thank 
you  for  your  leadership,  again,  as  I  said,  I  know  you’ve  been  in-
volved,  and  it’s  been  fun  working  with  you  on  a  lot  of  this  stuff. 
We’re  pleased  to  have  the  Chairman  of  the  full  Committee  here, 
who  has  helped  lead  us  to  get  that  bill  ready  to  be  on  the  floor, 
and Senator Inouye, thank you for that. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, I wanted to be here, Mr. 
Chairman,  to  demonstrate  my  support  for  the  work  being  con-
ducted by this Subcommittee. 

A  few  weeks  ago  I  read  an  article  that  was  a  bit  frightening.  It 
indicated that one-third of fourth graders in the United States per-
formed  at  or  above  a  level  deemed  proficient,  and  about  a  fifth  of 
eighth graders lacked the competency to perform basic mathematic 
computations.  In  this  country,  only  32  percent  of  Americans  grad-
uate  with  college  degrees  in  science  and  engineering,  and  at  the 
same  period,  in  China,  the  Chinese  graduated  more  than  600,000 
engineers, India, 350,000, and we had less than 70,000. 

I think something must be done to change these trends, and I’m 

here to give my support, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

6 

Thank  you  very  much.  May  I  have  the  rest  of  my  statement  in-

cluded? 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Our economy’s strength derives from our competitiveness as a nation in the fields 
of emerging technologies. The genius and painstaking work of our scientists, and the 
hard-won  government  funding  for  research  and  development,  are  investments  that 
have paid dividends not only in world class peer-reviewed scientific papers but also 
in  cutting  edge  technologies  that  keep  America  competitive  in  the  global  market-
place. 

America’s  young  people  are  surrounded  by  an  array  of  these  sophisticated  tech-
nologies.  They  use  these  complex  gadgets  with  ease  and  confidence  for  both  study 
and play. Unfortunately, we have heard the warnings from Norm Augustine and his 
National  Academy  of  Sciences  panel  in  Rising  Above  the  Gathering  Storm  that  our 
technologically  sophisticated  youth  are  slipping  behind  their  international  competi-
tors when it comes to discovering and building the next generation of products. 

Although it seems that every month there is a new ‘‘best’’ cell phone or MP3 play-
er that every teenager wants, how many of those teenagers actually understand the 
science  behind  wireless  communications  technology,  or  what  it  takes  to  develop  the 
applications and operating systems that actually make the phone, and the network, 
for that matter, operational? 

This  pattern  is  far  more  pervasive  than  simply  cell  phones  and  teenagers.  Less 
than  one-third  of  U.S.  fourth  graders  performed  at  or  above  a  level  deemed  ‘‘pro-
ficient’’ and about one-fifth of eighth graders lacked the competency to perform basic 
math computations. In the United States, only 32 percent graduate with college de-
grees in science and engineering. 

In  2004,  while  China  graduated  more  than  600,000  engineers  and  India  grad-
uated  350,000  engineers;  the  United  States  graduated  less  than  70,000  engineers. 
We must take action today to turn these trends around if we are to stay competi-

tive tomorrow. 

As the researchers of today retire, and reports to Congress indicate that they will 
be  retiring  in  large  numbers  during  the  next  few  years;  there  must  be  a  next  gen-
eration  to  take  their  places.  That  means  we  need  to  educate  our  children  so  they 
can  do  more  than  talk  about  the  science.  They  need  to  be  able  to  do  the  science. 
Further,  scientists,  like  any  other  member  of  our  workforce,  go  to  where  the  jobs 
are.  That  means  we  need  to  have  the  world-class  laboratories  and  facilities  nec-
essary  to  tackle  a  new  generation  of  questions  and  challenges,  and  those  labora-
tories and facilities need to be here in America. 

These  two  key  issues  formed  the  backbone  of  this  Committee’s  work  on  com-
prehensive  competitiveness  legislation,  S.  761,  the  America  COMPETES  Act,  and 
will be the lens through which we view the Fiscal Year 2008 U.S. research and de-
velopment budget. I look forward to working with you in the year ahead as we make 
these issues our top priority. 

Senator KERRY. Without objection, absolutely. The Chairman can 

have whatever the Chairman wants. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  appreciate  your 

taking the time to come here and share that with us. 

Senator Sununu? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  let 
me  begin  by  saying  that  it  really  is  important  to  be  having  this 
hearing  and  this  discussion.  We  had  at  least  one  similar  hearing 
last year—the more, the better—because of the importance of basic 
mathematics and science to our economy on the broadest scale. And 
I  think  you  described  that  quite  accurately  in  your  opening  com-
ments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

7 

Second,  let  me  underscore  that  I  appreciate  the  amount  of  time 
and  effort  spent  in  developing  the  competitiveness  legislation  that 
is  scheduled  to  be  introduced  in  the  Senate,  in  the  coming  weeks. 
I know there was a very sincere effort to make that bill comprehen-
sive,  to  try  to  address  a  number  of  recommendations  that  have 
been  put  forward  by  the  Administration,  by  independent  groups, 
and  by  Members  of  Congress  as  well—we  all  have  our  priorities. 
And, I’ll begin by talking about the most important goals of that 
legislation,  which  I  strongly  support,  and  have  supported  for  some 
time, and spoken about as far back as 5 or 8 years ago, when I was 
a  member  of  the  House  of  Representatives.  That  is,  first  and  fore-
most,  doubling  the  amount  of  money  committed  to  the  National 
Science  Foundation  for  peer-reviewed  research.  It  is  the  best, 
strongest,  most  effective  vehicle  we  have  for  advancing  basic 
science, in the United States and around the world. High-risk basic 
research has very long time horizons for payback, and the benefits 
are  very  widely  distributed,  and  they  are  not  areas  that  capital 
markets,  or  venture  capitalists  or  others  in  the  private  sector  can 
really  accurately  forecast.  And  that’s  why  the  Government  has  a 
responsibility in this area. 

Second,  increasing  the  Office  of  Science  within  the  Department 
of  Energy  which  is  also  involved  in  this  basic  research,  from  $3.6 
billion to over $5 billion in the coming 5 years. 

Third,  increasing  our  commitment  to  the  National  Laboratories, 
that  are,  really,  the  crown  jewels  in  terms  of  the  physical  infra-
structure  necessary  to  do  this  important  research.  Those  are  crit-
ical,  essential  goals,  extremely  valuable  achievements  that  are  set 
out in the competitiveness legislation. 

However—and  there  is  a  very,  very  important  ‘‘however’’  here— 
I’m  very  concerned  that—because  there  were  so  many  hands  in  it, 
perhaps, because there are competing interests, because there were 
four  or  five  Committees  in  the  Senate  alone,  with  jurisdiction—its 
effectiveness will be diluted. We’ve seen a proliferation of programs 
and  ideas  in  there  that  I  am  principally  concerned  will  take  away 
from  the  focused  mission  in  each  of  these  three  areas:  Office  of 
Science,  National  Science  Foundation,  National  Laboratories.  In-
stead  of  maximizing  the  funding  available  for  peer-reviewed  re-
search in physics and chemistry and material science and computa-
tional  mathematics,  this  legislation  would  begin  the  process  of 
carving out specific fiefdoms for programmatic funding. 

And  whether  it’s  for  education  and  human  resources,  or  for  be-
havioral sciences—anything that is not geared directly toward that 
mission  of  peer-reviewed  science,  carries  the  risk  of  diluting  the 
power and the importance of these institutions, for these important 
goals we share. 

I’m  extremely  concerned  about  that,  these  institutions  can  pro-
vide  great  axis  for  educational  programs,  especially  for  college  and 
graduate level work in the math and science fields, but their focus 
needs to remain on the peer-reviewed work. And, I’m very much in-
clined  to  try  to  offer  some  amendments  to  make  sure  we  get  back 
to that focus and that emphasis. 

Second,  as  Senator  Kerry  mentioned,  we  shouldn’t  be  picking 
winners and losers in private markets where there are commercial 
operations  and  commercial  players.  And,  I  suppose  there’s  an  hon-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

8 

est disagreement, what constitutes picking winners and losers, but 
I  will  pick  up  on  the  example  Senator  Kerry  gave,  and  this  is  an 
area  of  disagreement,  and  I  don’t  want  to  get  bogged  down  here, 
I  just  want  to  present  a  slightly  different  viewpoint  on  the  Ad-
vanced Technology Program. 

You mentioned an example of an LCD manufacturer, it’s a great 
industry,  I’m  sure  it’s  a  terrific  company.  But,  they  are  manufac-
turing  commercial  products  for  sale  in  the  United  States  and 
around  the  world,  and  any  time  that  we  provide  a  grant  to  a  com-
pany  manufacturing  products  for  commercial  sale,  we  are  picking 
winners  and  losers,  because  that  means  there  are  some  companies 
manufacturing  similar,  or  even  the  same  products  for  commercial 
sale that won’t get the grant. 

And, at the same time, I recognize the Federal Government does 
a lot of this. But we need to be very concerned anywhere there are 
direct  grants  or  subsidies  going  to  people  engaged  in  competitive 
commercial activity. And that, to me, is picking winners and losers. 
And,  we  need  to  do  everything  possible  to  minimize  or  avoid  that 
kind  of  intervention  in  competitive  markets—again,  anywhere 
we’re  doing  work—but  in  this  legislation,  in  particular,  there  are 
some  programs  created  in  the  competitiveness  bill,  recreated,  that 
would do just that. 

And, again, any time we are doing that—intervening in commer-
cial  markets—we’re  diluting  resources,  and  limiting  resources  that 
could go to physics and chemistry, computational mathematics and 
material science—basic peer-reviewed scientific research. 

Third,  is  this  issue  of  education—trying  to  encourage  our  edu-
cational  systems  to  produce  more  students  interested  in  science 
and mathematics and engineering. I don’t know if it’s a good thing 
or a bad thing that I speak from some experience, because I’m the 
only  member  of  the  U.S.  Senate  with  a  Bachelor’s  Degree  in  Engi-
neering.  But,  maybe  that  makes  me  biased,  maybe  that  makes  me 
more knowledgeable, I don’t know the answer to that question. 

But  it  is  my  personal  experience  that  individuals,  men  and 
women,  pursue  education  in  engineering  at  college  because  they 
are, they find that they are interested in math and science in high 
school. And that interest in math and science that comes to fruition 
in  high  school,  or  really  begins—I  shouldn’t  say  comes  to  fruition, 
but  is  inspired  in  high  school—doesn’t  even  begin  in  high  school, 
it  really  begins  in  5th,  6th,  7th,  and  8th  grade.  That’s  where  a 
young girl or a young boy realizes, ‘‘This is interesting, this is excit-
ing.  I  enjoy  math  and  science,  I’m  good  at  it,  and  when  I  get  to 
high  school  I’ll  look  forward  to  taking  math  and  science  classes.’’ 
And,  if  it  doesn’t  happen  in  6th  or  7th  or  8th  grade,  it’s  not  going 
to happen when they’re a junior or senior in high school. 

So,  if  you  really  want  to  do  something  about  creating  engineers, 
you don’t create programs necessarily for post-graduate students in 
material  science—that  doesn’t  encourage  more  engineers.  It  might 
be an important program for a post-graduate electrical engineering 
student,  but  if  you  want  to  get  more  post-graduate  electrical  engi-
neering  students,  you  need  to  get  more  electrical  engineering  un-
dergraduates.  And  if  you  want  more  electrical  engineering  under-
graduate  students,  you  need  to  get  them  interested  in  math  and 
science in 6th and 7th and 8th grade. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

9 

So,  a  huge  burden  here  has  to  be  on  our  K  through  12  system. 
And  whether  it’s  inspiration  through  the  Department  of  Education 
in math and science in K through 12, or the corporate leaders that 
come to Washington that complain that we don’t have enough math 
and science students getting more involved at the local level, to in-
spire  math  and  science  focused  curriculum—those  are  all  good 
ideas,  and  those  ought  to  be  pursued.  But,  we  need  to  recognize 
that the inspiration process occurs much earlier. 

Senator  Inouye  had  it  exactly  right—the  scary  statistics  are  the 
proficiency  in  4th  grade,  and  proficiency  in  8th  grade.  And  if  only 
a third are proficient in 4th or only half are proficient in 8th, you’re 
going to get fewer math and science students in high school, in col-
lege.  That’s  just  a  basic  fact.  So,  for  in  terms  of  inspiration,  and 
encouraging  more  to  pursue  this  field,  we  have  to  deal  with  those 
numbers that Senator Inouye talked about. 

I  think  we  need  to  remain  focused  on  the  basics,  we  need  to  act 
as aggressive as possible at pursuing these goals for doubling NSF 
funding,  Office  of  Science  funding,  and  National  Laboratory  fund-
ing, and we need to remain true to our mission. 

One  final  thought  about  the  educational  effort.  The  Academic 
Competitiveness Council put out its initial findings in March. They 
looked at all of our science, technology, engineering and math edu-
cation programs in the Federal Government. And, on the one hand, 
I think we can say we’re pleased to find there are lots of them. On 
the  other  hand,  they’re  not  necessarily—as  the  Council  found—as 
focused as they should be, there are duplication and overlaps, there 
is not necessarily the follow-through that there should be. 

A  dozen  in  the  Department  of  Agriculture,  seven  in  the  Depart-
ment of Commerce, eight in the Department of Defense, 12 in Edu-
cation,  34  in  the  National  Science  Foundation,  six  in  the  Depart-
ment  of  Transportation,  five  in  the  Department  of  Health  and 
Human  Services  and  so  on—all  of  these  programs  focused  on 
science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics.  And  what  I 
don’t  think  we’ve  done  in  the  competitiveness  bill  is  look  at  these 
programs,  and  find  out  ways  to  strengthen  them  and  improve 
them, and make sure they’re focused on the goals that we do share, 
that absolutely come to us across party lines. 

So,  I  hope  that  we’ll  do  more  to  look  at  how  those  programs  are 
implemented.  If  we  look  at  the  programs  in  the  target  areas  that 
they have, of that list of programs, 57 of them focus on under-rep-
resented  populations,  39  focus  on  teachers,  60  focus  on  practi-
tioners,  61  on  undergraduate  students  who  are  majors,  21  on  un-
dergraduate  students  who  are  non-majors,  51  on  graduate  studies. 
So we can see that there is a lot of duplication, and that’s not nec-
essarily  a  bad  thing,  but  we  want  to  make  sure  that  their  efforts 
are  as  complementary  as  possible,  where  we  have  multiple  pro-
grams. 

I  know  that’s  a  tall  order,  you’ve  been  very  generous  with  the 
time, Mr. Chairman, I just think it’s important that we emphasize, 
even  as  we  pursue  the  right  goals,  and  the  right  levels  of  funding, 
we want to make sure that we stay as focused as possible. No legis-
lation  is  perfect,  and  even  when,  where  we  have  legislation,  we’re 
going to have some disagreement on what you might put in the bill 
and what I might put in the bill, but I think there’s so much agree-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

10 

ment  here,  and  so  much  consensus  about  the  importance  of  this 
issue, we ought to be able to improve it before it finally goes to the 
President. 

Thank  you  very  much,  you  were  very,  very  generous  with  the 

time, and I appreciate that. 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Senator  Sununu.  We  do  want  to  get 
to  our  witnesses,  I  want  to  just  make  one  comment  on  the  ATP, 
but  Senator  Thune,  do  you  want  to  make  any  comment,  or  are 
you—? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you  for  holding  this 
hearing.  I  think  this  is  an  important  subject,  and  it’s  obviously  a 
tough issue for us to get our arms around because there isn’t a sin-
gle  policy  that’s  going  to  keep  us  competitive.  As  the  world  leader 
in science, innovation, and entrepreneurship, I think we have to be 
continually  focusing  on  fostering  math,  science,  and  basic  research 
at our schools and universities in order to stay on top, and we also 
have  to  ensure  that  we’ve  got  good  tax  rates,  regulatory  regimes, 
and  legal  environments  that  aren’t  so  onerous  that  we  lose  busi-
nesses and jobs to other countries. 

We  aren’t  creating  our  policy  in  a  vacuum,  and  if  we  don’t  get 
it  right,  some  other  country  will,  and  we  will  lose  businesses  and 
jobs to that country. 

Again,  I  appreciate  you  holding  this  hearing,  I  think  this  is  an 
important  subject,  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses 
and I have a couple of questions when that time comes. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator KERRY. Great. 
Well,  we’re  going  to  go  fairly  rapidly  to—I  do  want  to  just  com-
ment on one thing if I can on the ATP, and I don’t want to engage 
in a long, drawn-out debate. 

When I was Lieutenant Governor of Massachusetts, I sat ex offi-
cio  on  a  board  called  the  Mass  Technology  Development  Corpora-
tion, and we were specifically charged with allocating certain fund-
ing  to  venture  startup  efforts  using  state  money  for  projects  that 
simply  couldn’t  get  funded  in  the  private  sector—they  were  very 
high-risk, they were very long-distant future for returns, but it was 
a promising field. 

And  our  charge  was,  specifically,  to  sort  of  make  a  selection  be-
tween  those  kinds  of  projects,  which  we  did,  and  the  minute—if 
they  were  successful,  that  they  showed  that  success,  an  ability  to 
stand  on  their  own,  we  withdrew.  The  Government  got  out  of  it, 
and the normal capital market process would take over. 

I’m  pleased  to  say  that  there  are  a  number  of  companies  today 
on the big board that have provided enormous job base and signifi-
cant  revenues  to  our  state  that  would  otherwise  not  have  been 
funded if we hadn’t done that. And, I think we did it with a sensi-
tivity  to  this  notion  of  not  picking,  you  know,  specific  winner  or 
loser, but taking a project in a sector that couldn’t get funded. 

Now, ATP has had the very, very similar kind of charge here. It 
fills  a  national  need,  broad-based  innovation  requirements  for  the 
Nation. And, sure an ATP participant benefits from this. But, they 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

11 

put  up  the  majority  of  the  funding.  And,  they’re  taking  huge  risk, 
which otherwise the private sector won’t fund. 

Now,  it’s  good  and  well  to  sit  here  and  say,  ‘‘Well,  the  private 
marketplace ought to do this,’’ but they don’t. Everybody knows it. 
There’s  only  so  much  private  capital,  there’s  a  capital  pool  that 
goes  out  there,  there’s  a  certain  risk  they’re  willing  to  take.  The 
fact  is  that  we  have  repaid,  in  the  tax  base  of  our  country,  more 
times over, many times, what we’ve put up. 

So,  if  you  want  to  talk  about  return  on  investment,  and  smart 
leverage, this has been about as smart a leverage program as there 
is.  And  the  ATP  selection  criteria  require  that  the  potential  bene-
fits of projects be broad-reaching, not narrow, incremental improve-
ments, but broad-reaching improvements that spill out into the rest 
of  the  economy.  And  significantly,  it’s  been  extensively  reviewed 
since its inception. 

There have been more—there have been the General Accounting 
Office has conducted 14 studies, 10 studies have been completed by 
the Department of Commerce’s Inspector General former Secretary 
of  Commerce  Bill  Daly  sponsored  a  60-day  study,  the  National 
Academy  of  Science’s  National  Research  Council  published  ATP 
Challenges  and  Opportunities  in  1999,  and  ATP  Assessing  Out-
comes, in 2001. 

In  addition,  25  studies  have  been  conducted  by  ATP’s  Economic 
Assessments  Office  and  they  have  all—all—revealed  that  the  ATP 
does not, does not fund projects that otherwise would have been fi-
nanced  in  the  private  sector.  Rather,  the  ATP  have  funded  the  so- 
called  Valley  of  Death  projects,  those  that  just  couldn’t  find  the  fi-
nancing otherwise. 

And in June of 2001, the National Academy of Science, National 
Research  Council  completed  its  comprehensive  review,  and  they 
found  that  it’s  an  effective  Federal  partnership,  funding  new  tech-
nologies that contribute to important societal goals. 

I  could  go  on  and  on  and  on—I’m  not  going  to  now,  but  I  really 
think  that  given  that  kind  of  a  record,  and  we  can  get  into  this  a 
little bit, it’s hard to understand why somebody would zero-fund it. 
Measured against the unbelievable successes that we’ve had. 

So,  you  know,  it’s  worthy  of  a  debate—all  of  these  things  are 
worthy  of  debate,  but  the  facts  are  facts,  and  the  record  is  the 
record,  and  it’s  pretty  darn  hard  to  ignore,  sort  of,  the  sensitivity 
with  which  it’s  been  constructed,  the  requirements  are  very  rig-
orous for who can participate and how, and what the benefits have 
been. 

I know we wanted to try to get here, Senator Pryor, did you want 
to  make  any  quick  comment,  because  we  do  want  to  try  to,  you 
know, thanks, very much. 

Dr. Marburger, if you’d lead off, we’d appreciate it very much. 
And your full testimonies can be placed in the record, if you want 
to summarize, we can get to have a good dialogue here, and that’d 
be helpful. 

STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN MARBURGER III, DIRECTOR, 

OFFICE OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY, 

EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT 

Dr. MARBURGER. Thank you, I will do that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

12 

And  thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Kerry,  and  Ranking  Mem-
ber  Ensign,  members  of  the  Subcommittee  for  inviting  me  to 
present the President’s Fiscal Year 2008 research and development 
budget. 

And I also want to thank the Committee on behalf of the Admin-
istration  for  the  good  working  relationship  that  it  has  established 
with  the  science  agencies,  and  with  my  office.  And  I  look  forward 
to  working  together  on  the  important  task  of  fostering  innovation 
and competitiveness. We agree on the thrust of the principles, I be-
lieve. 

As you know, President Bush has proposed a Federal budget that 
will  balance  in  5  years.  By  continuing  strong  pro-growth  economic 
policies,  and  by  holding  non-security  discretionary  spending  below 
inflation.  And  that  requires  establishing  priorities,  and  allocating 
resources to achieve the greatest impact. 

Winning the war on terror, securing the homeland, strengthening 
the  economy  remain  the  President’s  top  priorities,  and  this  year’s 
budget,  once  again,  proposes  investments  in  America’s  future  com-
petitiveness through research and development. 

The President is proposing a $142.7 billion Federal R&D budget, 
that’s  another  record-breaking  budget,  an  increase  of  $5.5  billion 
over  his  2007  proposal.  And  within  this  record-breaking  top  line 
amount,  are  increases  in  categories  of  funding  that  are  important 
for broad national goals, including innovation and competitiveness. 
In  this  budget,  non-defense  research  increases  at  a  higher  rate 
than  the  rest  of  the  discretionary  budget,  expanding  once  again, 
this  year,  the  science  share  of  available  funds  to  13.9  percent,  it’s 
unprecedented. 

Growth  in  non-defense  R&D,  important  for  civilian  productivity, 
during  this  Administration  has  been  substantial,  and  there’s  a 
chart in my written testimony in the record. 

The  basic  research  category,  which  includes  Department  of  De-
fense  61  funds,  also  grows  in  this  budget,  by  nearly  a  billion  dol-
lars, from $27.5 billion to $28.4 billion. The indicator called Federal 
Science  and  Technology,  which  includes  DOD  61  and  62  funds,  in-
creases by $1.5 billion, relative to the President’s 2007 proposal. 

Many  of  these  increases  come  from  follow-through  on  the  Presi-
dent’s  American  Competitiveness  Initiative  last  year,  and  further 
commitments  to  R&D  this  year  to  diversify  America’s  energy  sup-
ply. 

The ACI does set education as well as research priorities, and it 
focuses funds accordingly. The overarching research priority in the 
ACI  is  innovation-enabling  basic  research  in  physical  science  and 
engineering.  Multi-year  funding  targets  are  set  for  NSF,  NIST  re-
search,  and  DOE’s  Office  of  Science,  which  has  been  mentioned 
here.  The  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  calls  for  a  7.2  percent  increase 
for these agencies, on top of the 9.3 percent increase the President 
requested  in  Fiscal  Year  2007.  This  additional  $764  million  would 
bring  the  two-year  ACI  research  incremental  investment  to  $2.6 
billion. 

Unfortunately, the Fiscal Year 2007 Continuing Resolution proc-
ess  only  provided  half  of  the  first  year  ACI  budget  increase  re-
quested,  $452  million  short  of  the  President’s  request.  And,  I  do 
hope we can catch up this year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

13 

This  program  responds  to  a  very  strong  call  from  the  Nation’s 
high-tech community, as you’ve noted, Mr. Chairman whose recent 
American  Innovation  Proclamation—a  very  nice  summary,  I  would 
say  of  our  mutual  goals—summarizes  exactly  the  principles  of  the 
President’s initiative. The Proclamation has been endorsed by hun-
dreds  of  American  business  and  higher  education  leaders,  and  it 
preserves  the  focus  and  the  priorities  that  are  so  important  to  the 
American Competitiveness Initiative. 

This  budget  contains  substantial  investments  in  research  and 
other important areas that are described in more detail in my writ-
ten  testimony.  It  sustains  budgets  for  climate  change  and  science 
and  technology,  it  includes  funding  to  improve  Earth  observations 
capabilities  in  areas  such  as  ocean  observing,  earthquake  moni-
toring  and  prediction,  tsunami  warnings.  It  provides  funds  for  the 
Landsat  Data  Continuity  mission,  the  Global  Precipitation  Meas-
urement  Mission,  launches  a  new  Ocean  Initiative,  with  over  $80 
million. 

The Advanced Energy Initiative in this budget, that, Department 
of  Energy  is  increased  by  26  percent,  to  $2.7  billion,  accelerating 
clean  electricity  generation  technologies.  This  year  the  AEI  in-
cludes  over  $700  million  in  basic  research  at  DOE’s  Office  of 
Science,  a  32  percent  increase,  to  overcome  major  technical  bar-
riers, the use of solar, biomass, hydrogen and fusion. 

We  have  other  initiatives—the  National  Nanotechnology  Initia-
tive continues to grow, biomedical research would receive $431 mil-
lion in new funds over the 2007 request, and so forth. 

Let me just finish this rapid and incomplete overview by express-
ing  a  concern  about  NASA,  and  the  budget  danger  that  lies  ahead 
for this agency. 

The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  includes  a  3.1  percent 
increase for NASA in 2008, on top of the 3.4 percent the President 
requested  for  2007.  But,  unfortunately,  once  again,  the  CR  held 
NASA  more  than  a  half  a  billion  dollars  below  the  President’s  re-
quest,  which  causes  great  stress  on  that  agency,  and  we’re  con-
cerned about that. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  believe  that  this  year’s  R&D  budget  proposal 
does provide robust levels of investment that will allow America to 
maintain  its  leadership  position  in  science,  and  move  ahead  in  se-
lected priority areas. 

I’d  like  to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  address  the  Com-

mittee on these points. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Marburger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN MARBURGER III, DIRECTOR, OFFICE OF SCIENCE 

AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY, EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT 

Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I 
am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  to  present  the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2008 
research  and  development  (R&D)  budget.  Although  this  is  my  first  appearance  be-
fore  the  Committee  under  the  new  Congressional  leadership,  I  am  aware  that  this 
Committee  has  expressed  bipartisan  support  for  science  funding  in  the  past,  and 
values scientific research and its applications for the benefits it brings to every part 
of our society. On behalf of the Administration, I thank the Committee for the good 
working relationship it has established with the science agencies and with my office, 
and look forward to working together in the future to advance American innovation 
and competitiveness. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

14 

This year, President Bush presents a Federal Budget that will balance in 5 years. 
The President proposes to do this by continuing strong pro-growth economic policies 
and by holding non-security discretionary spending below inflation. This strategy in-
evitably  requires  establishing  priorities  and  allocating  resources  to  achieve  the 
greatest  impact.  Winning  the  war  on  terror,  securing  the  homeland  and  strength-
ening the economy remain the President’s top priorities, and this year’s budget once 
again emphasizes investments in America’s future competitiveness through research 
and  development.  The  President  is  proposing  a  record  $142.7  billion  2008  Federal 
R&D  Budget,  an  increase  of  $5.5  billion  over  his  2007  Budget.  And  the  American 
Association for the Advancement of Science (AAAS) estimates that 2008 non-defense 
Federal  R&D  is  increased  by  over  2.1  percent  in  the  President’s  Budget,  much  bet-
ter than overall non-defense discretionary spending. The President’s commitment to 
the government’s R&D enterprise is strong, and the advancement of science remains 
among his top budget priorities. 

While  significant  increases  have  occurred  for  defense-related  development—most 
of the ‘‘D’’ in R&D—it is important to be aware of the very significant growth during 
this  Administration  in  non-defense  research  spending,  as  shown  in  the  accom-
panying chart. 

Non-defense R&D has continued on a significantly upward trajectory. In fact, with 
President Bush’s 2008 Budget, real growth in outlays for the conduct of non-defense 
R&D—i.e.  corrected  for  inflation—is  up  26.5  percent  during  the  7-years  of  this  Ad-
ministration. 

The  2008  Budget  also  raises  funding  for  the  category  of  Basic  Research  almost 
$1  billion  above  the  most  currently  calculated  level  of  2006:  $28.4  billion  compared 
to  $27.5  billion.  This  is  a  direct  indication  of  the  Administration’s  strong  focus  on 
fundamental  research  and  the  discovery  of  new  knowledge  as  a  leading  mission  of 
the  Federal  Government.  It  is  notable  that  this  favorable  treatment  of  Basic  Re-
search  is  occurring  in  a  year  of  belt-tightening  for  many  other  domestic  programs, 
indicating the high priority this Administration places on the importance of this ac-
tivity. 

Basic Research, by itself, however, is not the complete measure of investment ac-
tivities that drive future innovation. The accounting category known as the Federal 
Science and Technology Budget emphasizes both basic and applied science and engi-
neering research short of development, and thus captures other important activities 
underpinning  competitiveness.  The  Federal  S&T  Budget  advances  $1.3  billion  in 
2008  relative  to  2006  funding  levels,  and  when  only  civilian  S&T  agencies  are  con-
sidered, it represents a 4 percent increase. If Congress fully supports the President’s 
2008  request,  Federal  science  and  technology  investment  will  increase  $1.5  billion 
from the President’s own 2007 Budget. 

These  very  positive  historical  trends  directly  reflect  the  launch  of  the  American 
Competitiveness  Initiative  (ACI)  last  year  and  further  commitment  to  the  impor-
tance  of  research  and  development  to  diversify  America’s  energy  supply  in  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
B
R
A
M
9
1
4

15 

year’s  State  of  the  Union  address.  This  focus  on  research  and  development,  science 
and  math  education,  and  advanced  energy  solutions  directly  supports  our  National 
goals  of  protecting  the  homeland,  educating  our  children  and  making  the  economy 
strong. 

The American Competitiveness Initiative establishes clear research and education 
priorities  and  focuses  increased  funding  accordingly.  The  overarching  ACI  research 
priority  is  innovation-enabling  physical  science  and  engineering  research.  As  the 
next  chart  illustrates,  ACI  funding  increases  under  this  priority  are  targeted  to 
three  science  agencies,  including  two  under  the  jurisdiction  of  this  Subcommittee— 
the  National  Science  Foundation  and  the  laboratories  of  the  National  Institute  of 
Standards  and  Technology—as  well  as  DOE’s  Office  of  Science.  The  2008  Budget 
calls for a 7.2 percent increase on top of 2007’s 9.3 percent requested increase. This 
additional  $764  million  brings  the  total  two-year  ACI  Research  incremental  invest-
ment to $2.6 billion. I want to note that the recently released ‘‘American Innovation 
Proclamation—a  package  of  consensus  recommendations  by  American  business  and 
higher education leaders—calls for the doubling of the ACI research agencies. 

Unfortunately,  the  2007  Continuing  Resolution  only  provided  50  percent  of  the 
first-year  ACI  budget  increase.  That  was  $452  million  short  of  the  increase  in  the 
President’s request. I know this Committee is as disappointed as I am at this short-
fall  for  science.  This  is  not  sufficient  to  meet  America’s  competitiveness  challenge, 
and  falls  short  of  the  aforementioned  doubling  path  that  is  the  key  component  of 
the Initiative. A year of enhanced and expanded high-impact innovation research is 
diminished  and  a  $1.2  billion  increase  is  now  required  in  2008  to  ‘‘catch  up’’  to  the 
President’s commitment. Achieving this in 2008 is critical to sustaining momentum 
necessary to complete the doubling Initiative in the outyears. 

Before turning to other specifics of this year’s research budget, I want to comment 
on S. 761, the America COMPETES Act, which I understand Senate leadership may 
be considering for floor time. While I commend this Committee and the entire Sen-
ate for its leadership and efforts on the issue of competitiveness, I must share with 
you  concerns  I  have  regarding  the  specific  provisions  of  this  legislation.  These  con-
cerns, which I raised in a letter (appended) to the Committee when nearly identical 
legislation  was  considered  last  year,  largely  center  on  the  many  new  programs  cre-
ated  in  the  bill,  and  how  their  focus  and  cost  would  divert  resources  available  for 
priority basic research in the physical sciences at the key ACI agencies (for example, 
the  Administration  estimates  the  legislation  creates  up  to  20  new  programs  and 
could  cost  over  $8.6  billion  more  than  projected  Administration  budgets  over  4 
years).  I  hope  the  Senate  will  give  strong  consideration  to  these  concerns,  in  Com-
mittee or otherwise, before it commits to floor consideration of any competitiveness- 
related  legislation.  I  believe  we  share  a  common  interest  in  working  to  strengthen 
America’s capacity to innovate and retain its leadership position in the global econ-
omy, and I look forward to working with you toward this goal. 

Another  major  concern  I  must  address  is  the  serious,  deleterious  impacts  of  ear-
marking  on  the  Federal  science  budget  in  the  past.  Earmarks  circumvent  the  sci-
entific merit-review process for identifying and funding the best research. That proc-
ess  has  been  the  bedrock  of  our  Nation’s  scientific  leadership.  On  January  3,  2007, 
President  Bush  called  on  Congress  to  cut  the  number  and  cost  of  earmarks  by  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
B
R
A
M
9
1
4

16 

least  half  this  year.  To  help  establish  a  clear  and  transparent  benchmark  for  accu-
rately  measuring  the  President’s  goal,  OMB  developed  a  database  on  FY  2005  ear-
marks.  As  we  discuss  the  importance  of  pursuing  the  best  science  to  contribute  to 
U.S.  competitiveness,  I  hope  the  new  Congress  will  reject  research  earmarks  in  FY 
2008,  as  it  so  commendably  did  in  a  spirit  of  reform  in  the  Continuing  Resolution 
for the current Fiscal Year. We would like to work with the new Congress to achieve 
the President’s goal. 

While future competitiveness is a national priority that is reflected in the Federal 
R&D  budget  request,  there  are  additional  national  goals  that  are  similarly  well- 
served  by  the  FY  2008  Budget.  Since  2002,  the  Administration  has  spent  approxi-
mately  $9  billion  on  climate  change  science  research  through  the  multi-agency  Cli-
mate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP),  and  the  President’s  2008  Budget  sustains 
that  level  of  effort.  I  should  note,  however,  that  some  of  the  research  projects  in-
cluded in earlier CCSP totals have now advanced to operational missions which are 
no  longer  included  in  CCSP  totals,  but  which  certainly  contribute  significantly  to 
advancing climate science research. Further, between 2003 and 2006, the President 
has committed nearly $3 billion annually to the climate change technology research 
and deployment programs that constitute the multi-agency Climate Technology Pro-
gram.  The  U.S.  leads  the  world  in  advancing  climate  science  and  technology,  with 
expenditures on the order of $35 billion in climate-related science, technology, inter-
national assistance, and incentive programs during this Administration. 

Undoubtedly,  previous  investments  in  advanced  energy  science  and  technology 
have put the U.S. well on track to meet the President’s goal of reducing greenhouse 
gas  intensity  18  percent  by  2012.  In  addition,  the  2008  Budget  includes  funding  to 
improve  our  Earth  Observations  capabilities  in  areas  such  as  ocean  observing, 
earthquake  monitoring  and  prediction,  and  tsunami  warnings.  The  Budget  request 
also provides funding to continue the Landsat Data Continuity Mission, to move for-
ward  with  the  Global  Precipitation  Measurement  mission,  and  to  launch  a  new 
Ocean Initiative with over $80 million in new funding for ocean science research at 
the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, NSF and the U.S. Geological 
Survey. This Ocean Initiative is based on priorities set forth in the Ocean Research 
Priorities Plan: Charting the Course for Ocean Science in the United States, a report 
of  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council’s  Joint  Subcommittee  on  Ocean 
Science  and  Technology,  written  with  significant  input  from  the  external  scientific 
and resource management communities. 

Biomedical  research  is  supported  in  the  2008  NIH  Budget  with  an  increase  of 
$431 million over the 2007 request. The FY 2008 request of $28.7 billion will allow 
NIH to maintain many priorities including awarding over 9,400 new and competing 
research  grants.  The  NIH  Director’s  Roadmap  Initiative  is  increased  in  2008  to  en-
hance  this  interdisciplinary  incubator  for  new  ideas  that  will  accelerate  the  pace  of 
discovery across the NIH’s 27 Institutes and Centers. 

The  Advanced  Energy  Initiative  (AEI)  at  DOE  is  funded  at  $2.7  billion  in  the 
2008  Budget,  which  is  a  26  percent  increase  over  the  President’s  2007  request  and 
almost $1 billion more than 2006. The AEI will develop technologies that could help 
contribute  to  the  President’s  goal  of  cutting  gasoline  use  by  20  percent  in  10  years 
through  legislative  and  regulatory  actions.  AEI  will  help  by  accelerating  the  tech-
nical  and  cost  viability  of  plug-in  hybrids,  hydrogen-powered  fuel  cells,  and  ‘‘cel-
lulosic’’  ethanol  derived  from  biomass,  which  are  all  technologies  that  could  help 
meet  the  President’s  twenty  in  ten  goal.  AEI  will  also  accelerate  clean  electricity 
generation  technologies  such  as  solar,  wind,  nuclear,  and  clean  coal.  Perhaps  most 
critically, the 2008 AEI includes over $700 million in basic research at DOE’s Office 
of  Science,  a  32  percent  increase,  to  overcome  major  technical  barriers  to  the  use 
of solar, biomass, hydrogen and fusion. With the 2008 Budget, the Presidential com-
mitment to invest $2 billion on clean coal research is fulfilled, as is President Bush’s 
commitment to propose a five-year, $1.2 billion Hydrogen Fuel Initiative. 

This  Administration’s  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  also  strongly  continues 
with  $1.45  billion  in  2008  for  this  multi-agency,  highly-coordinated  investment  in 
fundamental  research,  multi-disciplinary  centers  of  excellence,  and  development  of 
focused  cutting-edge  research  and  education  infrastructure.  The  NNI  also  supports 
activities addressing the societal implications of nanotechnology, including those re-
lated  to  human  and  environmental  health  and  methods  for  managing  potential 
risks. With the 2008 request, over $8 billion will have been spent on nanoscale R&D 
in 7 years. 

Finally,  let  me  finish  by  expressing  a  concern  regarding  NASA  and  the  budget 
danger  that  lies  ahead  for  this  agency.  The  President’s  FY  2008  Budget  includes  a 
3.1  percent  increase  for  NASA  in  2008  on  top  of  the  President’s  3.4  percent  re-
quested increase for 2007. However, the FY 2007 CR held NASA $545 million below 
the  President’s  request.  That 
(hurricane 

leaves  NASA  at 

its  2006 

level 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

17 

supplementals removed) with no increase and puts at risk the Vision for Space Ex-
ploration  and  priority  Earth  and  space  science  missions.  Certainly  at  risk  is  the 
timely  development  of  a  new,  much  more  capable  U.S.  human  spacecraft  to  follow 
the Space Shuttle which will be retired in 2010. 
Budget Highlights of Agencies of Jurisdiction 
National Science Foundation (NSF) 

Funds  are  requested  to  increase  the  budget  for  NSF  to  $6.43  billion  in  FY  2008, 
45  percent  above  2001’s  $4.43  billion  level.  Similar  investments  in  the  past  have 
yielded  important  scientific  discoveries,  which  boost  economic  growth  and  enhance 
Americans’ quality of life. 

The  centerpiece  of  the  American  Competitiveness  Initiative  is  President  Bush’s 
plan  to  double  investment  over  a  10-year  period  in  key  Federal  agencies  that  sup-
port  basic  research  programs  emphasizing  the  physical  sciences  and  engineering. 
NSF is one of the three key agencies, as it is the primary source of support for uni-
versity  and  academic  research  in  the  physical  sciences,  funding  potentially  trans-
formative basic research in areas such as nanotechnology, advanced networking and 
information  technology,  physics,  chemistry,  material  sciences,  mathematics  and  en-
gineering. 

NSF  has  central  roles  in  two  previously  mentioned  Administration  priority  re-
search  areas  that  promise  to  strengthen  the  Nation’s  economy:  the  National  Nano-
technology  Initiative  (NNI)  and  the  Networking  and  Information  Technology  R&D 
program  (NITRD).  NSF-funded  nanotechnology  research,  proposed  at  $390  million 
in FY 2008, a 5 percent increase over the 2007 request and 160 percent since 2001, 
has  advanced  our  understanding  of  materials  at  the  molecular  level  and  has  pro-
vided insights into how innovative mechanisms and tools can be built atom by atom. 
This  emerging  field  holds  promise  for  a  broad  range  of  developing  technologies,  in-
cluding higher-performance materials, more efficient manufacturing processes, high-
er-capacity  computer  storage,  and  microscopic  biomedical  instruments  and  mecha-
nisms. NSF’s investments in NITRD, funded at $994 million in 2008, up $90 million 
over  2007  and  56  percent  since  2001,  support  all  major  areas  of  basic  information 
technology  (IT)  research.  NSF  also  incorporates  IT  advances  into  its  scientific  and 
engineering  applications,  supports  using  computing  and  networking  infrastructure 
for  research,  and  contributes  to  IT-related  education  for  scientists,  engineers,  and 
the IT workforce. 

The  2008  NSF  Education  and  Human  Resources  (EHR)  budget  will  advance  ef-
forts  to  prepare  U.S.  students  for  the  science  and  engineering  workforce  with  a  7.5 
percent increase (+$53 million) over the level in FY 2007 CR, adjusted for the move-
ment  of  EPSCoR  to  the  Research  and  Related  Activities  account.  To  further 
strengthen  NSF’s  emphasis  on  increasing  the  quality  and  quantity  of  the  science 
and  engineering  workforce  and  ensuring  that  undergraduate  students  are  well  pre-
pared for an increasingly technological global society, EHR will increase funding for 
its undergraduate education portfolio by $13.4 million. This total includes $3.5 mil-
lion  for  the  Course,  Curriculum,  and  Laboratory  Improvement  (CCLI)  program  and 
$5.1  million  for  the  Advanced  Technological  Education  (ATE)  program  to  improve 
technician  training  at  community  colleges.  The  FY  2008  EHR  budget  also  provides 
an  increase  of  $8.9  million  for  the  Graduate  Research  Fellowship  program,  an 
amount that will support an additional 200 graduate students, and $4.53 million for 
the  Centers  of  Research  Excellence  in  Science  and  Technology,  a  program  designed 
to broaden participation in the science and engineering workforce. The FY 2008 re-
quest  provides  increased  support  for  K–12  STEM  education  including  $30  million 
for  new  awards  under  the  Math  and  Science  Partnerships  program.  The  increases 
in funding for the ATE and CCLI programs also benefit K–12 students, in the case 
of the former by providing support for high school students who participate in dual- 
enrollment  or  articulated  technician  education  programs,  and  the  later  which  aims 
to improve undergraduate STEM education to all students, including those who will 
become  K–12  teachers.  Similarly,  since  many  research  projects  and  centers  include 
education  and  outreach  activities  for  K–12  students  and  teachers,  the  increased 
funding for research also benefits K–12 education. 
National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) 

The  Department  of  Commerce’s  NIST  ‘‘core’’  research  and  facilities  receive  $594 
million in 2008, an increase of 21 percent from the level in the FY 2007 CR, which 
is $42 million below the President’s 2007 ACI request. In 2008, the American Com-
petitiveness Initiative proposes NIST funding increases of $69 million for new initia-
tives in research and measurements in high-leverage areas such as the Disaster-Re-
silient  Structures  and  Communities  Program,  the  interagency  Climate  Change 
Science Program, and the interagency National Earthquake Hazards Reduction Pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

18 

gram. Support continues for high-leverage, broad impact research in quantum infor-
mation processing, nanotechnology, and new and expanded capabilities at the NIST 
Center  for  Neutron  Research  and  at  its  Boulder,  Colorado,  high-performance  labs. 
National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) 

The President’s 2008 Budget for NASA is $17.3 billion, a 3.1 percent increase over 
the President’s 2007 request, reflecting a strong commitment by the Administration 
to the continued pursuit of the Vision for Space Exploration. The FY 2007 CR, how-
ever, reduces the 2007 Budget by $545 million to $16.2 billion. 

In 2008, NASA requests $3.92 billion for exploration systems including the Orion 
Crew Exploration Vehicle (CEV) and the Ares I launch vehicle that will carry astro-
nauts  to  the  Moon.  Having  already  initiated  the  acquisition  process  for  certain  ele-
ments  of  this  architecture  during  2006,  NASA  anticipates  that  all  Orion  CEV  and 
Ares  I  elements  will  be  under  contract  by  the  end  of  2007,  with  the  first  crewed- 
flight planned to occur no later than 2014. 

The  2008  Budget  requests  $5.52  billion,  almost  a  third  of  NASA’s  total  budget, 
to  continue  operating  the  59  spacecraft  of  NASA’s  Science  Mission  Directorate  and 
to  support  investments  in  future  Earth  and  space  science  missions,  vital  tech-
nologies, and frontier research. NASA will develop seven new Earth observing space 
missions,  including  the  Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission  and  the  Global  Precipita-
tion  Measurement  mission,  which  will  launch  no  later  than  2013.  NASA  will  con-
tinue  its  roles  in  the  interagency  Climate  Change  Science  Program  and  the  inter-
national  initiative  on  the  Global  Earth  Observing  System  of  Systems.  NASA  will 
also support studies of the Earth-Sun system using data from the STEREO mission 
and the upcoming Solar Dynamics Observatory. A new Lunar Science Research pro-
gram  will  conduct  robotic  investigations  of  the  Moon  as  a  part  of  the  Vision  for 
Space Exploration. Following up its missions to Mars and Saturn, NASA is sending 
ever-more capable spacecraft to Mars, Mercury, the asteroids, and Pluto. NASA also 
will  continue  its  vibrant  astronomy  program  through  its  Great  Observatories,  and 
will  upgrade  Hubble  in  2008  to  provide  five  more  years  of  productive  on-orbit  life, 
while planning new spacecraft, such as Webb and Kepler, that will search for plan-
ets around other stars and peer deep into the universe. Funding for the Beyond Ein-
stein  program  is  increased  in  FY  2008  to  act  on  the  forthcoming  recommendation 
from  the  National  Research  Council  regarding  a  strategy  to  unlock  the  secrets  of 
the fundamental physics of the universe. 

In December 2006, the President approved the Nation’s first National Aeronautics 
R&D  Policy.  Consistent  with  this  Policy,  the  2008  NASA  aeronautics  budget 
prioritizes  fundamental  aeronautics  research,  the  improvement  of  aviation  safety, 
and  research  that  will  help  support  the  development  of  the  Next  Generation  Air 
Transportation System. In addition, NASA will address infrastructure upgrades and 
maintenance  requirements  for  aeronautical  test  facilities  across  NASA  centers  that 
are  of  vital  importance  to  the  Nation.  The  2008  Budget  requests  $554  million  for 
NASA aeronautics, an almost 5 percent increase over the 2007 request after adjust-
ing for NASA’s implementation of simplified full-cost accounting. 
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) 

For  NOAA  in  the  Department  of  Commerce,  the  FY  2008  Budget  provides  $358 
million  for  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Research  (OAR),  a  $20  million  increase  over 
the  2007  Budget.  OAR  provides  for  ongoing  research  on  climate,  weather,  air  qual-
ity, and ocean processes. 

The  2008  NOAA  budget  supports  a  new  interagency  oceans  initiative  to  imple-
ment  the  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  including  $60  million  in  new  funding 
over the 2007 Budget to advance oceans science and research (of which $13 million 
is in OAR). Of this $20 million will address four near-term ocean research priorities 
established  by  the  Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan  and  Implementation  Strategy 
(ORPPIS),  published  in  January  (with  another  $20  million  from  NSF  and  USGS). 
The NOAA Budget also proposes $40 million to develop an operational ocean moni-
toring  network,  to  delimit  the  extent  of  the  U.S.  Continental  Shelf,  for  technology 
and  other  infrastructure  to  support  ocean  science,  for  International  Polar  Year  ac-
tivities, and for research on protected species and commercial fisheries. 
Department of Transportation (DOT) 

The  FY  2008  Budget  request  for  highway-related  research  is  $430  million,  con-
sistent  with  the  level  in  the  multi-year  surface  transportation  research  authoriza-
tion.  Highway  research  includes  the  Federal  Highway  Administration’s  transpor-
tation research and technology contract programs. These research programs include 
the investigation of ways to improve safety, reduce congestion, improve mobility, re-
duce  lifecycle  construction  and  maintenance  costs,  improve  the  durability  and  lon-
gevity of highway pavements and structures, enhance the cost-effectiveness of high-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

19 

way infrastructure investments, and minimize negative impacts on the natural and 
human environment. 

The  2008  Budget  request  for  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  Research, 
Engineering, and Development is $140 million, including $63 million focused on the 
advancement  of  the  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System  led  by  its  Joint 
Planning and Development Office. 

In addition, the 2008 Budget requests $12 million for the Research and Innovative 
Technology  Administration  to  coordinate  and  advance  the  pursuit  of  transportation 
research that cuts across all modes of transportation, such as hydrogen fuels, global 
positioning  and  remote  sensing.  DOT  research  programs  also  support  the  National 
Nanotechnology  Initiative,  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Technology  Program,  and  the 
President’s Hydrogen Fuel Initiative. 
Budget Highlights of Other Important Science Agencies 
Department of Energy (DOE) 

The Office of Science in DOE (DOE–SC) is one of the three priority research agen-
cies  in  the  President’s  American  Competitiveness  Initiative,  supporting  scientific 
studies  and  infrastructure  for  a  wide  range  of  basic  research  related  to  potentially 
significant  innovations.  The  2008  Budget  provides  $4.4  billion  for  DOE–SC,  an  in-
crease  of  16  percent  over  the  level  in  the  2007  House-passed  full-year  Continuing 
Resolution (CR), which is $306 million below the President’s 2007 ACI request. The 
Budget  includes  funding  for  priorities  such  as  nanotechnology  ($286  million),  mate-
rials  science  research  facilities  ($699  million),  basic  research  in  support  of  the  Hy-
drogen  Fuel  Initiative  ($60  million),  the  Advanced  Energy  Initiative  ($713  million), 
and high-end computing facilities and research ($340 million). The Budget also com-
pletes funding ($45 million) for project and engineering design of the National Syn-
chrotron Light Source II, a new x-ray light source that will enable the study of ma-
terials  properties  and  functions  at  a  level  of  detail  and  precision  (nanoscale)  never 
before  possible.  It  continues  support  for  construction  of  the  Linac  Coherent  Light 
Source—a  materials  research  facility  that  will  provide  laser-like  x-rays  allowing  an 
unprecedented real-time glimpse of chemical and biological processes, fully funds op-
erations for the five nanoscale science research centers, and provides funding for the 
project and engineering design for the upgrade of the Continuous Electron Beam Ac-
celerator Facility. 

DOE  implements  the  President’s  Advanced  Energy  Initiative  (AEI),  highlighted 

above. The 2008 AEI Budget proposes: 

voltaic materials; 

electric and ‘‘plug-in’’ hybrid vehicles; 

• $217 million for the solar R&D to accelerate development of cost-effective photo-
• $292  million  for  the  biomass  R&D,  including  $179  million  for  the  Biofuels  Ini-
tiative  and  an  additional  $113  million  in  supporting  basic  research,  to  help  en-
able cellulosic ethanol to become practical and competitive; 
• $42  million  for  development  of  high-energy,  high-power  batteries  for  hybrid- 
• $40  million  for  wind  energy  research  to  help  improve  the  efficiency  and  lower 
the  costs  of  wind  technologies,  and  to  help  overcome  technical  and  regulatory 
barriers to more wide-scale deployment of wind technologies; 
• $108 million for the FutureGen project to develop technologies for a coal gasifi-
• $309  million  for  the  Hydrogen  Fuel  Initiative,  a  crosscut  of  activities  at  DOE 
that  includes  AEI  activities  to  accelerate  development  of  hydrogen  production, 
storage  and  infrastructure  technologies  that  can  help  make  possible  the  use  of 
hydrogen-powered fuel cell vehicles and infrastructure to support them. 

cation plant with near-zero atmospheric emissions; and 

The  2008  AEI  budget  also  proposes  $395  million  for  the  Global  Nuclear  Energy 
Partnership (GNEP) in Nuclear Energy with the goals to demonstrate advanced fuel 
cycle  technologies,  to  expand  the  domestic  use  of  nuclear  power,  and  to  provide  for 
safe,  environmentally  responsible  global  nuclear  energy  systems  that  support  non- 
proliferation objectives. Full funding of $160 million for the U.S. contribution to the 
ITER international fusion energy project is included as well. 
Department of Defense (DOD) 

DOD’s FY 2008 R&D budget is almost $79 billion. This level of funding will sup-
port the Department’s commitment to transform its capabilities and forces for great-
er agility, while enabling effective responses to asymmetric and uncertain challenges 
of  future  conflicts.  These  funds  will  also  help  address  emergent  threats  through 
countermeasures  to  biological  agents  and  will  advance  novel  technologies  to  detect 
and  neutralize  improvised  explosive  devices,  mines,  rockets  and  mortars.  DOD  pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

20 

vides  the  largest  share  of  NITRD  program  funding,  over  $1  billion,  to  address  IT 
needs  for  the  Nation’s  defense.  Likewise,  DOD  will  invest  $375  million  under  the 
National  Nanotechnology  Initiative,  emphasizing  development  of  materials,  devices 
and systems that address the national security mission. 

The Science and Technology (S&T) component of the overall DOD R&D budget in-
cludes basic research (6.1), applied research (6.2), and advanced technology develop-
ment (6.3). At $10.8 billion in the FY 2008 Budget, DOD S&T exceeds the 2001 en-
acted  level  by  21  percent,  or  $1.8  billion.  From  2000  to  2007,  Congressional  ear-
marks to DoD S&T quadrupled. For 2007, there were over 1,200 of these adds (total-
ing  $2.8  billion),  most  of  which  must  be  identified  and  tracked  down,  advertised  in 
a  way  specific  to  the  Congressional  mark,  evaluated,  negotiated  and  awarded,  in 
some way separate from other potential awards. This means that those awards con-
sume  several  times  the  staff  and  management  resources  of  the  average  research 
award, and may not even target a military-specific research need. The large number 
of such additions creates impediments to the creation of effective research programs 
throughout  the  Department,  and  should  be  cause  for  concern  to  Congress  as  well 
as to the Administration. 

A  total  of  $1.43  billion  is  provided  for  DoD  6.1  basic  research  in  2008.  This  is  a 
nominal increase over the 2007 Budget and represents 13.3 percent of the DoD S&T 
Budget, more than last year’s 12.8 percent share. 
Department of Homeland Security (DHS) 

The  President’s  FY  2008  request  includes  $799  million  for  the  DHS  Directorate 
of Science and Technology and $562 million for the Domestic Nuclear Detection Of-
fice.  R&D  continues  to  play  a  key  role  in  securing  the  Nation  against  the  terrorist 
threat.  The  President’s  2008  Budget  maintains  an  aggressive  investment  in  sci-
entific research, technology development, and research infrastructure aimed at con-
tinuing  to  enhance  our  Nation’s  security.  Priority  research  areas  include:  $100  mil-
lion in transformational R&D aimed at enhancing our ability to detect, identify, and 
attribute  nuclear  and  radiological  materials;  $68  million  for  explosives  counter-
measures  research;  and  $15  million  to  fund  cyber  security  and  information  assur-
ance R&D. 
United States Geological Survey (USGS) 

The  President  has  proposed  a  budget  of  $975.0  million  for  USGS  in  the  Depart-
ment of the Interior in Fiscal Year 2008. The proposed budget includes an increase 
of  $3  million  for  the  new  oceans  initiative  activities,  including  $1.5  million  in  the 
Coastal  and  Marine  Geology  program  to  begin  implementation  of  the  Oceans  Re-
search Priorities Plan and Implementation Strategy. This involves conducting obser-
vations, research, and sea-floor mapping and developing forecast models. The budget 
also  includes  $1.5  million  in  the  Hydrologic  Networks  and  Analysis  program  to 
begin  implementation  of  an  interagency  National  Water  Quality  Monitoring  Net-
work  that  will  integrate  watershed,  coastal  waters,  and  ocean  monitoring  based  on 
common criteria. 

The  FY  2008  USGS  budget  continues  funding  for  operations  and  maintenance  of 
Landsats  5  and  7  at  $16  million.  The  Budget  also  includes  $24  million  to  fund  ef-
forts  with  NASA  and  the  Landsat  Science  Team  to  continue  development  of  the 
Landsat Data Continuity Mission. 
Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) 

The  FY  2008  Budget  for  science  and  technology  funding  at  EPA  is  $755  million. 
Research  priorities  include  supporting  the  agency’s  risk  assessment  programs  in-
cluding  Air  Quality  Science  Assessments  (formerly  called  the  Air  Quality  Criteria 
Documents) and the Integrated Risk Information System (IRIS), and the Science to 
Achieve  Results  (STAR)  program  of  extramural  research  and  graduate  fellowships 
in areas of environmental science and engineering; $69 million is requested to fund 
new  and  ongoing  research  in  water  security,  including  monitoring  and  surveillance 
of terrorist threat agents, and post-incident decontamination. 
Conclusion 

Making choices is difficult even when budgets are generous, but tight budgets re-
quire  priorities  to  be  focused,  and  program  management  to  be  strengthened.  This 
year’s R&D budget proposal provides robust levels of investment that allow America 
to  maintain  its  leadership  position  in  science  and  move  ahead  in  selected  priority 
areas.  The  American  Competitiveness  Initiative  and  Advanced  Energy  Initiative 
properly  focus  R&D  investments  in  areas  that  will  increase  our  economic  competi-
tiveness,  decrease  our  dependence  on  foreign  oil,  and  accelerate  development  of 
clean energy technologies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

21 

America  currently  spends  one  and  a  half  times  as  much  on  federally-funded  re-
search  and  development  as  Europe,  and  over  four  times  as  much  as  either  Japan 
or China, the next largest investors. Our scientists collectively have the best labora-
tories in the world, the most extensive infrastructure supporting research, the great-
est  opportunities  to  pursue  novel  lines  of  investigation,  and  the  most  freedom  to 
turn their discoveries into profitable ventures if they are inclined to do so. 

We lead not only in science, but also in translating science to economically signifi-

cant products that enhance the quality of life for all people. 

This  budget  will  sustain  this  leadership  and  maintain  science  and  technology  ca-
pabilities  that  are  the  envy  of  the  world.  I  ask  that  Congress  fully  fund  the  initia-
tives  advanced  in  the  President’s  proposal.  I  would  be  pleased  to  respond  to  ques-
tions. 

OFFICE OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY 
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT 

Washington, DC, May 17, 2006 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Mr. Chairman: 

I  am  writing  to  thank  you  for  your  strong  and  steadfast  leadership  on  issues  of 
importance to America’s science and technology enterprise, and to comment on legis-
lation  (S.  2802)  that  I  understand  your  Committee  may  be  considering  for  markup. 
First,  I  want  to  commend  you  for  your  efforts  to  highlight  the  paramount  impor-
tance of basic research to America’s long-term economic competitiveness. Your com-
mitment  to  this  issue  is  greatly  appreciated.  Your  support  now  for  the  President’s 
American Competitiveness Initiative (ACI) specifically will be crucial to the ultimate 
success of this domestic agenda priority. 

As you know, the centerpiece of the ACI is a commitment to double, over 10 years, 
funding for the three key Federal agencies that support high-leverage fields of phys-
ical  science  and  engineering:  the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  Department  of 
Energy’s  Office  of  Science,  and  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology 
labs within the Department of Commerce. The focus on these priority agencies was 
born out of an extensive and growing recognition that increasing the support for the 
basic  research  these  agencies  fund  in  the  physical  sciences  is  of  critical  importance 
to ensuring America maintains its competitive edge. 

The  proposed  American  Innovation  and  Competitiveness  Act  endorses  our  com-
mon  goal  of  strengthening  U.S.  competitiveness  through  science  and  technology. 
However,  I  must  raise  very  serious  concerns  with  regard  to  the  specific  provisions 
of  the  legislation.  While  the  President’s  ACI  proposal  is  a  targeted  effort  to  focus 
increased funding on existing peer-reviewed research at the three priority agencies, 
the  draft  bill  creates  a  multitude  of  new  programs  at  many  agencies,  which,  if  en-
acted, would undermine and delay this very research. The Administration is strong-
ly  opposed  to  the  creation  of  new  bureaucracy.  Many  of  the  draft  bill’s  provisions 
would  duplicate  or  complicate  existing  education  and  technology  programs.  Others 
would put the government in the position of competing with private investment and 
influencing  market  decisions  in  potentially  inefficient  and  counterproductive  ways. 
While we understand that the draft legislation is still a work in progress, the Ad-
ministration  is  especially  concerned  about  the  authorization  levels  currently  under 
consideration;  excessive  authorization  levels  may  discourage  and  divert  resources 
available for basic research in the physical sciences, thereby jeopardizing our shared 
goal to double funding for basic research at the key ACI agencies. 

I hope you will give strong consideration to these concerns as your Committee be-
gins  consideration  of  any  competitiveness-related  legislation.  I  believe  we  share  a 
common interest in working to strengthen America’s capacity to innovate and retain 
its  leadership  position  in  the  global  economy,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with 
you toward this goal. 

Thank you again for your leadership on these issues. 

Sincerely, 

JOHN H. MARBURGER III, 

Director. 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  doctor,  I  appreciate  that. 
Dr. Bement? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

22 

STATEMENT OF DR. ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR., DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and 
Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  tes-
tify  on  the  National  Science  Foundation’s  importance  to  U.S.  com-
petitiveness. 

NSF’s  commitment  to  the  science  and  engineering  enterprise 
comes from an abiding belief that knowledge is a powerful force for 
progress. 

NSF  works  at  the  frontier  of  knowledge,  where  high-risk,  high- 
reward  research  can  lay  the  foundation  for  revolutionary  tech-
nologies, and tackle complex problems that challenge society. 

Quite simply, our investments in fundamental research and edu-
cation aim to improve the quality of people’s lives, and to keep the 
Nation  safe  and  growing.  The  NSF  budget  for  2008  reflects  this 
vital agenda and is detailed in my written testimony. 

For over 50 years, NSF has been a strong steward of the Nation’s 
scientific discovery and innovation process that has been crucial to 
increasing America’s economic strength, global competitiveness, na-
tional  security  and  overall  quality  of  life.  Despite  its  small  size, 
NSF  has  an  extraordinary  impact  on  scientific  and  engineering 
knowledge and capacity. 

While NSF represents only 4 percent of the total Federal budget 
for research and development, it accounts for 50 percent of non-life 
science basic research at academic institutions. In fact, NSF is the 
only Federal agency that supports all fields of basic science and en-
gineering  research,  and  the  education  programs  that  sustain  them 
across the generations. 

NSF  relies  on  a  merit-based  competitive  process  that  is  critical 
to  fostering  the  highest  standards  of  excellence  and  accountability, 
standards for which NSF is known all around the world. 

Not  only  do  we  provide  funding  to  the  best  of  the  best,  we 
prioritize  the  research  funding  based  on  principles  that  have  prov-
en  to  be  both  robust  and  visionary  over  the  years.  The  proof  of  its 
effectiveness lies in the outcomes. 

NSF-funded  results  permeate  our  society—examples  include 
Doppler  radar,  MRI  scans,  nanotechnology,  the  Internet,  web- 
browsers, search engines, bar codes and computer-aided design sys-
tems.  NSF  investments  have  had  a  profound  effect  on  our  quality 
of life and on American competitiveness. Just these examples alone 
have added hundreds of billions of dollars to the U.S. economy over 
the past 15 years. 

I would like to point out just a few other recently funded develop-
ments with equal promise, some of which illustrate the accelerating 
convergence between the physical and the life sciences. NSF’s sup-
port for cutting-edge research projects often serve as bell weathers 
for solutions to a myriad of complex issues facing society. 

For  example,  implantable  generators,  with  advanced  drug  deliv-
ery  systems,  illustrate  nanotechnology’s  increasing  contribution  to 
understanding  and  treating  disease.  An  injectible  gel  to  treat  spi-
nal  cord  injuries  is  the  result  of  NSF-supported  polymer  research. 
The  Lasik  eye  correction  procedure  has  emerged  from  high-preci-
sion laser research, funded by NSF. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

23 

On  the  environmental  front,  thin  film  technologies  and  power 
plastics  sufficiently  generate  power  from  light,  offering  viable  re-
newable  energy  resources.  Meanwhile,  the  production  of  plastics 
from  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  puts  the  damaging  greenhouse 
gas to good use, helping to sustain the environment. 

NSF  programs  traditionally  integrate  research  and  education, 
fast-tracking  innovation  excellence  via  hands-on  learning.  For  ex-
ample,  NSF-supported  Advanced  Technology  Education  centers 
offer  industry-sanctioned  technician  education  programs.  The  cen-
ters  respond  directly  to  industry’s  workforce  needs,  and  graduate 
technicians who immediately enter the high-tech workforce. 

It is important to note that in our efforts to advance the frontier, 
we also aim to enhance developments of the Nation’s talent pool of 
scientists,  technologists,  engineers  and  mathematicians,  otherwise 
known  as  STEM.  The  world  class  STEM  talent  pool,  trained 
through NSF-sponsored research, transfers new scientific and engi-
neering  concepts  from  universities  directly  to  the  entrepreneurial 
sector  as  they  enter  the  workforce.  This  may  be  basic  research’s 
most  profound  and  lasting  impact.  This  capability  is  a  strong  suit 
in U.S. competitiveness, and one of NSF’s greatest contributions to 
the Nation’s innovation system. 

Another  significant  contribution  is  NSF-supported  coupling  pro-
grams  between  universities  and  the  private  sector.  NSF  centers 
programs,  such  as  our  Engineering  Research  Centers  and  Science 
and  Technology  Centers,  directly  invite  private  sector  partners  to 
engage  in  and  sponsor  related  cutting-edge  research  in  education 
that can lead to high-leverage innovations. 

Furthermore, NSF couples investments in our Small Business In-
novation  Research  and  Small  Business  Technology  Transfer  pro-
grams  with  high-impact,  emerging  technologies  such  as  nanotech-
nology, information technology, and bio-technology. 

Today  I’ve  only  touched  on  the  variety  and  richness  of  the  NSF 
portfolio.  NSF  research  and  education  efforts  contribute  greatly  to 
the  Nation’s  innovation  economy,  and  help  keep  America  at  the 
forefront  of  science  and  engineering.  Extraordinary  discoveries 
coming from NSF-funded researchers and initiatives enrich the en-
tire  science  and  engineering  enterprise,  and  make  education  fun, 
exciting,  and  achievement-oriented.  NSF  and  the  National  Science 
Board  looks  to  the  future,  committed  to  these  important  consider-
ations, and we have crafted our 2008 budget to address them. 

Mr. Chairman, and members of the Committee, I look forward to 
working with you in the months ahead, and would be happy to re-
spond to any questions that you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Bement follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR., DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION 

Chairman Kerry, Ranking Member Ensign, and members of the Committee, thank 
you for this opportunity to testify on the importance of basic research. It is a pleas-
ure  to  appear  before  you  again  on  this  important  topic.  I  would  like  to  thank  the 
Members of this Committee for their support for NSF over the years and specifically 
for  your  support  for  NSF  in  the  2007  Continuing  Resolution,  the  2008  budget  and 
the America COMPETES legislation. 

I  am  especially  pleased  to  emphasize  once  again  the  role  the  National  Science 
Foundation (NSF) plays in sustaining America’s competitiveness in the global econ-
omy. As you are well aware, the President’s request for NSF represents an 8.7 per-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

24 

cent  increase  over  the  appropriated  levels,  and  will  keep  NSF  on  the  course  set  by 
the  President’s  American  Competitiveness  Initiative  (ACI)  to  drive  innovation  and 
sharpen  America’s  competitive  edge.  This  year’s  budget  reinforces  the  Administra-
tion’s firm commitment to doubling overall funding for the NSF, the Department of 
Energy’s Office of Science, and the Department of Commerce’s National Institute of 
Standards and Technology labs over the next 10 years. 

For over fifty years, NSF has been a steward of the Nation’s science and engineer-
ing  enterprise,  with  a  track  record  of  producing  results.  NSF  investments  in  dis-
covery,  learning,  and  innovation  have  been  important  to  increasing  America’s  eco-
nomic  strength,  global  competitiveness,  national  security  and  overall  quality  of  life. 
Despite  its  relatively  small  size,  NSF  has  an  important  impact  on  scientific  and 
engineering knowledge and academic capacity. While NSF represents only 4 percent 
of  the  total  Federal  budget  for  research  and  development,  it  accounts  for  fifty  per-
cent  of  non-life  science  basic  research  at  academic  institutions.  In  fact,  NSF  is  the 
only  Federal  agency  that  supports  all  fields  of  basic  science  and  engineering  re-
search. 

NSF  relies  on  a  merit-based,  competitive  process  that  is  critical  to  fostering  the 
highest  standards  of  excellence  and  accountability—standards  for  which  NSF  is 
known all over the world. 

We  provide  funding  to  the  best  of  the  best.  Of  the  513  individuals  who  have  re-
ceived  the  Nobel  Prize  since  NSF  first  awarded  research  grants  in  1952,  174  or  34 
percent received NSF funding at some point in their careers. 

NSF-funded  research  has  led  to  social  benefits.  Examples  include  Doppler  radar, 
MRI  scans,  nanotechnology,  the  Internet,  web  browsers,  search  engines,  bar  codes, 
and  computer-aided  design  systems.  NSF  investments  have  played  an  important 
role  in  American  competitiveness  and  innovation.  The  economic  returns  from  these 
technologies  alone  have  added  hundreds  of  billions  of  dollars  to  the  U.S.  economy 
over the past 15 years. 

As  you  well  know,  investments  in  fundamental  research  often  yield  unexpected 
benefits. One example I like to use is NSF’s support of abstract auction theory and 
experimental economics. NSF-supported researchers provided the FCC with its cur-
rent system for apportioning the airwaves. Since their inception in 1994, FCC ‘‘spec-
trum auctions’’ have netted over $45 billion in revenue for the Federal Government 
and  more  than  $200  billion  in  worldwide  revenues.  Although  the  payoff  was  unex-
pected at the time NSF started supporting game-theory research, the payoff is many 
times  greater  than  the  total  investment  NSF  has  made  in  social  and  behavior 
sciences over our fifty year history. 

In our efforts to advance the frontiers of knowledge and spur innovation, NSF also 
aims  to  develop  of  the  Nation’s  talent  pool  and  create  a  highly  skilled  workforce. 
This may be NSF’s most profound, and lasting, impact. 

Perhaps even more important than the breakthroughs I have described above, are 
the  students  that  have  been  educated  and  trained  along  the  way,  including  as  par-
ticipants  in  prize-winning  research.  The  scientists,  technologists,  engineers,  and 
mathematicians  trained  through  the  integration  of  research  and  education  transfer 
new  scientific  and  engineering  concepts  from  universities  directly  to  the  entrepre-
neurial  sector  as  they  enter  the  workforce.  This  capability  is  a  strong  suit  in  U.S. 
competitiveness,  and  one  of  NSF’s  greatest  contributions  to  the  Nation’s  innovation 
system. 

Opportunities  to  advance  the  frontiers  of  research  and  education  are  more  prom-
ising  than  ever  before—across  every  field  of  science,  mathematics  and  engineering. 
No  matter  what  field  of  science  one  chooses—from  studying  the  smallest  particles 
of matter, to exploring the formation of the cosmos, to understanding dynamic inter-
actions among humans or unraveling the complexity of life on Earth—ground-break-
ing research is on the horizon. The NSF budget for FY 2008 sets an ambitious agen-
da  for  capitalizing  on  this  potential  to  discover  new  knowledge  that  can  help  boost 
the Nation’s economic vitality and improve our quality of life. 

NSF’s  commitment  to  the  science  and  engineering  enterprise  comes  from  an  en-
during belief that knowledge is a powerful force for progress. NSF works at the fron-
tier  of  knowledge  where  high-risk,  high-reward  research  can  lay  the  foundation  for 
revolutionary technologies and tackle complex societal problems. 

Quite  simply,  our  investments  in  fundamental  research  and  education  improve 
the  quality  of  people’s  lives  and  contribute  significantly  to  our  Nation’s  prosperity. 
The  NSF  budget  for  2008  reflects  this  vital  agenda,  and  I’m  pleased  to  present  it 
to you today. 

Let  me  begin  with  the  numbers.  Overall,  in  his  FY  2008  Budget  Request,  the 
President is requesting $6.43 billion for the NSF. That’s an increase of nearly $513 
million,  or  8.7  percent  above  the  2007  appropriated  amounts.  Funding  at  this  level 
in FY 2008 will keep us on the course set by the President’s American Competitive-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

25 

ness Initiative. The ACI aims to expand Federal research investments over the next 
10  years  to  drive  innovation  and  sharpen  America’s  competitive  edge.  Our  task  in 
this ambitious undertaking is to energize the Nation’s leadership in fundamental re-
search and education that keeps America at the leading edge of innovation. 

Funding levels increase for every major NSF appropriations account. Investments 
in  Research  and  Related  Activities  increase  by  7.7  percent,  and  our  Education  and 
Human  Resources  account  by  7.5  percent.  Rapid  progress  in  these  areas  will  gen-
erate new concepts and tools with far-reaching applications, lay the foundations for 
next-generation tools and technologies, and develop educational strategies to engage 
students  and  prepare  them  for  the  fast-changing,  global  environment.  The  budget 
includes increases for every Directorate and Office of NSF. 

Our  budget  priorities  for  2008  are  based  on  the  long-term  investment  strategies 
identified  in  the  new  NSF  Strategic  Plan.  They  are  focused  squarely  on  the  future. 
Discovery Research for Innovation 

The  first  priority  is  Discovery  Research  for  Innovation.  In  nearly  every  field  of 
science and engineering, we are moving toward new knowledge that will contribute 
to  the  resolution  of  some  of  society’s  most  stubborn  problems—in  areas  such  as  en-
ergy, security, health and the environment. And we are on the threshold of techno-
logical innovations that will power the economy well into the future. 

Today,  the  most  fertile  ground  for  discovery  is  often  at  the  interface  among  dis-
ciplines,  where  insights  from  one  field  inform  our  understanding  of  another.  To  ex-
plore that territory, our strategy must be to keep all fields and disciplines of science 
and engineering healthy and strong. We continue to address that objective in 2008. 
At the same time, we must be constantly alert to research that has the potential 
to  overturn  accepted  paradigms  and  open  entirely  new  fields  for  exploration.  Below 
I will highlight several of these emerging frontiers. But it is important to note that 
the  power  of  transformational  research  is  ubiquitous  today  across  the  social,  phys-
ical and life sciences, and engineering. 
Cyber-enabled Discovery and Innovation 

The  power  of  new  information  and  communications  allows  us  to  investigate  phe-
nomena of increasing complexity, scale and scope. But researchers are finding it in-
creasingly difficult to cope with the flood of data from improved observational tools, 
to  assimilate  different  data  formats  and  ontologies—atomic  to  the  cosmic—and  to 
find ways to store and archive petabyte-sized databases. 

In  2008,  NSF  will  invest  $52  million  in  a  new  initiative  we  call  Cyber-enabled 
Discovery  and  Innovation,  or  CDI.  CDI  will  explore  a  new  generation  of  computa-
tionally-based  discovery  concepts  and  tools  at  the  intersection  of  the  computational 
world and the physical and biological worlds. 

In every discipline, we need new techniques that can help scientists and engineers 
uncover  fresh  knowledge  from  vast  amounts  of  data  generated  by  sensors,  tele-
scopes, satellites, or even the media and the Internet. Understanding complex inter-
actions  in  systems  ranging  from  living  cells  to  binary  star  systems,  or  from  com-
puter networks to societies, also present challenges. 

We  need  improved  simulation  and  other  dynamic  modeling  techniques  to  support 
experiments  with  complex  systems—from  earthquakes  to  brains—that  are  not  fea-
sible to perform in the physical world. 

Finally,  virtual  environments  have  the  potential  to  enhance  collaboration,  edu-
cation, and experimentation in ways that we are just beginning to explore. CDI edu-
cational  research  efforts  will  center  on  a  combination  of  virtual  environments  and 
advanced cyberinfrastructure. CDI will tackle all of these challenging research prob-
lems. 
Ocean Research Priorities Plan 

Understanding  the  interactions  between  society  and  the  oceans  is  of  vital  impor-
tance  for  ensuring  a  clean,  healthy,  stable,  and  productive  ocean  environment.  The 
Ocean Research Priorities Plan (ORPP) lays out, for the first time, a national effort 
to  link  ocean  research  to  societal  issues  ranging  from  the  stewardship  of  ocean  re-
sources to the ocean’s role in climate. 

A  new  NSF  investment  of  $17  million  will  support  fundamental  research  and 
technology development in four areas identified in the Plan as near-term priorities. 
One area of investigation will look at the complex dynamics that control and regu-
late marine ecosystem processes—knowledge that is absolutely essential to improve 
the  management  of  marine  resources.  A  second  explores  variability  of  the  Merid-
ional  Overturning  Circulation  in  the  Atlantic  Ocean.  This  is  one  element  of  global 
ocean circulation that is responsible for long-term climate variations along the East-
ern  Seaboard.  Research  will  also  address  the  response  of  coastal  ecosystems  to 
events ranging from non-point source pollution to hurricanes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

26 

A fourth priority is the development of new marine sensors. This is also an impor-
tant  objective  of  the  Foundation’s  Ocean  Observatories  Initiative  (OOI).  OOI—to-
gether  with  other  observatories  such  as  NEON,  NEES,  and  GEON—will  make  an 
important contribution to GEOSS—the Global Earth Observation System of Systems 
(GEOSS).  This  research  complements  a  much  more  extensive,  ongoing  program  of 
ocean research and education at NSF. 
National Nanotechnology Initiative 

Nanotechnology  is  an  emerging  field  of  immense  promise,  with  ramifications  for 
manufacturing, medicine, and next-generation computing. With the promise of nano-
technology,  we  can  anticipate  systematic  programs  to  identify  or  design  a  broad 
spectrum of materials with just the right properties for the application in mind. 

We  are  increasing  our  investment  in  the  interagency  National  Nanotechnology 
Initiative  by  nearly  $17  million,  to  a  total  of  $390  million,  to  support  fundamental 
nanoscale research and the development of nanomaterials. 

A  critical  focus  of  this  investment  will  be  a  new  multidisciplinary  effort  to  better 
understand the environmental, health, and safety impacts of nanomaterials. This re-
search  will  explore  the  interactions  between  nano  particles  and  materials  and  the 
living  world  at  all  scales.  The  development  of  innovative  methods  and  tools  to  de-
tect,  characterize,  and  monitor  nano  materials  in  the  environment,  is  an  important 
feature of these activities. 
International Science and Engineering 

International  partnerships  are  now  an  abiding  feature  of  the  global  science  and 
engineering  landscape.  U.S.  scientists  and  engineers  must  remain  connected  with 
researchers  around  the  globe  to  detect  movements  at  the  frontier  and  capitalize  on 
new  concepts.  This  is  essential  if  we  wish  to  be  the  first  nation  of  choice  for  sci-
entists, engineers, and students from abroad. 

Moreover,  in  this  era  of  globalization,  international  experience  is  fast  becoming 
an  essential  element  in  the  training  of  U.S.  undergraduate  and  graduate  students. 
NSF  will  support  agency-wide  activities  to  expand  international  partnership  op-
portunities  for  U.S.  scientists,  engineers  and  students,  with  an  increase  of  nearly 
11 percent for the Office of International Science and Engineering, for a total of $45 
million. 
Preparing the Workforce for the 21st Century 

Creating  a  strong  science  and  engineering  workforce  for  the  future  is  vital  to 
maintaining  the  Nation’s  competitive  edge.  NSF  will  continue  to  fund  a  portfolio  of 
highly successful programs. 

You will recognize all of them: CAREER, aimed at junior faculty; Advanced Tech-
nological Education (ATE) to train skilled technicians and technologists; Broadening 
Participation in Computing, designed to train the future IT workforce; Noyce Schol-
arships, which promote the development of a world-class math and science teaching 
corps;  The  STEM  Talent  Expansion  Program  (STEP)  and  the  Centers  for  Research 
Excellence  in  Science  and  Technology  (CREST),  both  of  which  aim  to  broaden  par-
ticipation  of  underrepresented  groups  and  engage  a  broader  spectrum  of  institu-
tions,  two  objectives  of  vital  importance  to  maintaining  America’s  global  competi-
tiveness. 

In coordination with the Department of Education, NSF will continue funding for 
the  Math  and  Science  Partnership  program,  aimed  at  improving  K–12  science  and 
math  education  and  teaching.  Although  the  2008  Request  for  MSP  remains  at  the 
FY  2007  level  of  $46.0  million,  approximately  $30  million  will  be  available  for  new 
awards in 2008. 

The budget request also includes funding for an additional 200 Graduate Research 
Fellowships  (GRF).  Together  with  other  NSF  graduate  fellowship,  that  brings  the 
total number of graduate students supported to about 5,375. 
Transformational Facilities and Infrastructure 

World-class  tools  and  facilities  are  every  bit  as  essential  for  discovery.  Our  strat-
egy  is  to  invest  in  tools  that  promise  significant  advances  in  a  field  and  to  make 
them widely available to a broad cross-section of investigators. 

For FY 2008, NSF proposes one new start in the Major Research Equipment and 
Facilities  Construction  account  (MREFC):  Advanced  LIGO  (AdvLIGO),  a  gravita-
tional wave observatory that will improve by a factor of 10 the sensitivity of current 
earth-based  facilities.  Observations  made  with  this  instrument  could  revolutionize 
the field of theoretical physics. 

Scientific  breakthroughs  that  are  just  over  the  horizon  will  require  speeds  and 
abilities  that  even  today’s  supercomputers  cannot  produce.  The  development  of  a 
petascale  computing  capability  will  continue  to  be  an  important  priority  for  NSF. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

27 

Our  commitment  to  support  cyberinfrastructure  remains  equally  steadfast.  These 
investments  will  optimize  high-end  computing  and  cyberinfrastructure  for  science 
and  engineering  applications—and  contribute  to  the  Nation’s  competitiveness  in 
many other ways. 

Funding  for  the  Major  Research  Instrumentation  (MRI)  program  increases  by 
about $24 million to a total of $114 million. In addition, we will raise the maximum 
level  of  funding  within  MRI  from  $2.0  million  to  $4.0  million.  These  funds  support 
the  design  and  acquisition  of  mid-size  instruments  that  are  every  bit  as  essential 
as their big brothers. 
International Polar Year (IPY) 

As  the  lead  agency  supporting  Polar  research,  NSF  will  provide  U.S.  leadership 
for  IPY  activities  through  support  for  an  intense  research  and  public  education  ef-
fort. The budget request includes nearly $59 million for these activities. 

In  the  Polar  Regions,  we  are  discerning  the  outlines  of  environmental  change, 
from sea ice extent, retreating glaciers, shifting patterns in flora and fauna, to envi-
ronmental observations by Arctic natives. Such change—whether environmental, bi-
ological  or  social—has  implications  for  the  rest  of  the  globe.  Polar  change  ripples 
across the planet on a spectrum of time scales, through the atmosphere, oceans, and 
living systems. 

We  do  not  yet  fully  understand  the  causes  of  what  we  are  observing.  Now  is  the 
time  to  change  this,  for  new  tools  make  possible  the  needed  observations  and  syn-
thesis  of  knowledge.  They  range  from  satellites  to  ships  to  sensors,  and  from 
genomics  to  nanotechnology,  information  technology,  and  advances  in  remote  and 
robotic technologies. 

For  these  reasons,  climate  change  research  and  environmental  observations  will 
be a major focus for NSF IPY activities. Much of this research will support the goals 
of the U.S. Climate Change Science Program. Because the scope and scale of climate 
change  is  global,  U.S.  scientists  will  collaborate  with  scientists  from  around  the 
world. 

Another IPY research effort will explore how life functions and survives in the ex-
tremes of the polar regions. A surprising diversity of life flourishes in the McMurdo 
dry valleys of Antarctica, for example. Research will focus on microorganisms at var-
ious  scales,  but  will  include  a  diversity  of  organisms.  Research  on  humans  in  polar 
environments will advance our understanding of our species’ place in the complexity 
of polar phenomena. 

IPY offers an excellent opportunity for outreach and education to raise public un-
derstanding  of  science  and  engineering  and  NSF  will  continue  to  support  such  ef-
forts. 
Stewardship 

Also among our 2008 priorities is Stewardship—our commitment to support excel-
lence  in  science  and  engineering  research  and  education  by  maintaining  a  capable 
and  responsive  organization.  I  would  be  remiss  if  I  didn’t  mention  that  the  success 
of our post—award and pre—award oversight and merit review process depends en-
tirely on our program officers and program directors. They all know that the optimal 
use  of  limited  public  funds  relies  on  two  conditions:  Ensuring  that  research  is 
aimed—and continuously re-aimed—at the frontiers of understanding; and certifying 
that every dollar goes to competitive, merit-reviewed, and time-limited awards with 
clear  criteria  for  success.  When  these  two  conditions  are  met,  the  Nation  gets  the 
most intellectual and economic leverage from its research investments. 

Our  2008  Budget  request  would  provide  adequate  funding  for  operations  and 
award management i.e., salaries and expenses), particularly in the information tech-
nology field, which is critical to the agency functioning as efficiently as possible. We 
need  to  maintain  our  investments  in  productivity-enhancing  tools,  including 
cybersecurity,  and  modernization  of  information  technology  as  well  as  continue  to 
provide  post-award  oversight.  I  applaud  Members  of  this  Committee  for  their  sup-
port for full funding of our FY 2008 budget request. 

NSF  has  just  completed  a  new  strategic  plan  for  2006–2011.  As  a  direct  result 
of  the  strategic  planning  process,  NSF  has  established  eight  new  multi-year  objec-
tives  for  stewardship.  We  will  strengthen  our  traditional  partnerships  and  develop 
new  collaborations  with  other  agencies  and  organizations.  We  will  also  expand  ef-
forts  to  broaden  participation  from  underrepresented  groups  and  institutions  in  all 
NSF activities. 

NSF leads Federal agencies in funding research and education activities based on 
competitive merit review, with over 88 percent of its research and education funding 
going to awards selected through a competitive merit review process. Improving the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

28 

transparency,  consistency,  and  uniformity  of  the  merit  review  process  is  a  priority 
for 2008 and into the future. 

An  objective  for  2008  is  establishing  the  Research.gov  portal  site—a  one-stop 
website  for  grantees  seeking  Federal  funding.  The  portal  will  also  help  research 
agencies  share  grants  management  best  practices  as  part  of  the  Grants  Manage-
ment Line of Business. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  I’ve  only  touched  upon  some  of  the  variety  and  richness  of  the 
NSF portfolio. NSF research and education efforts contribute greatly to the Nation’s 
innovation economy and help keep America at the forefront of science and engineer-
ing. At the same time, NSF-supported researchers produce leading edge discoveries 
that  serve  society  and  spark  the  public’s  curiosity  and  interest.  Extraordinary  dis-
coveries  coming  from  dozens  of  NSF  programs  and  initiatives  are  enriching  the  en-
tire  science  and  engineering  enterprise,  and  making  education  fun,  exciting  and 
achievement-oriented. 

Scientists  can  now  peer  back  in  time  to  the  early  years  of  the  universe,  from  its 
explosive formation to its dark ages, to its first stars and mini-galaxies. Seeing this 
far  into  the  past  is  a  remarkable  feat  of  science  and  engineering  creativity  and 
imagination.  It  is  imperative  that  we  also  use  our  knowledge  to  illuminate  the  fu-
ture. The ultimate reason for the science and engineering enterprise is to put knowl-
edge to work for the growth of the economy and the well being of society. 

At  the  beginning  of  the  21st  century,  America  has  the  world’s  best  cadre  of  sci-
entists  and  engineers.  We  have  some  of  the  finest  academic  institutions  anywhere. 
And maybe most importantly, we have a half century of experience working to per-
fect  what  is  commonly  acknowledged  as  the  most  successful  system  for  supporting 
research, coupled with educating our scientists and engineers. 

As  this  century  plays  out,  there  will  be  an  increasing  number  of  competent  play-
ers  in  the  global  competition  for  ideas,  talent,  and  innovation.  In  this  context, 
‘‘globalization’’ is shorthand for a complex, permanent, and challenging environment 
that calls for sustainable, long-term responses, not just short-term fixes. The nation 
needs  bold  efforts,  at  the  most  demanding  levels  of  creative  enterprise,  to  sustain 
a leadership role in the global economy. 

In  these  shifting  sands,  I  believe  that  America  can  continue  to  be  on  the  leading 
edge of ideas and research that can chart the global path for the next half century. 
We want our universities and businesses to continue leading the world in discovery 
and  innovation.  That  means  cultivating  our  strengths—U.S.  leadership  in  funda-
mental  discovery—including  high-risk,  high-reward  transformational  research— 
state-of-the-art facilities and infrastructure, and a world-class S&E workforce. These 
strategies can help us reinvent American competitiveness in the 21st Century. 

But  make  no  mistake.  Staying  at  the  forefront  of  discovery  and  innovation  will 
require  sustained  investments.  In  a  science  and  technology  based  world,  to  retreat 
from the frontier is to put the Nation at peril. 

NSF  is  committed  to  cultivating  a  science  and  engineering  enterprise  that  not 
only  unlocks  the  mysteries  of  the  universe  but  that  addresses  the  challenges  of 
America  and  the  world.  The  National  Science  Foundation  looks  to  the  future  with 
these important considerations in mind, and we have crafted our 2008 budget to ad-
dress them. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  I  hope  that  this  brief  overview 
conveys to you the extent of NSF’s commitment to advancing science and technology 
in  the  national  interest.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  in  months  ahead,  and 
would be happy to respond to any questions that you have. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Dr. Bement. 
Dr. Jeffrey? 

STATEMENT OF DR. WILLIAM A. JEFFREY, DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Dr.  JEFFREY.  Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and 
Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I’m  pleased  to  present  the  Presi-
dent’s 2008 budget request for NIST. 

This  is  a  strong  budget  that  will  further  enhance  our  ability  to 
support  the  measurements  and  standards  needs  of  U.S.  industry 
and universities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

29 

NIST  has  a  long  history  of  being  at  the  forefront  of  new  innova-
tions  through  our  measurements  and  standards.  In  2003,  the  Na-
tional  Academy  of  Engineering  identified  the  greatest  engineering 
achievements  of  the  20th  century.  NIST  measurements  and  stand-
ards  were  integral  to  the  successful  development  and  adoption  of 
virtually every one. 

Nineteen  retrospective  studies  of  economic  impact  show  that,  on 
average,  NIST  labs  generated  a  benefit  to  cost  ratio  of  44  to  1  to 
the  U.S.  economy.  The  high  rate  of  return  results  from  the  fact 
that  new  measurements  or  standards  benefit  entire  industries  or 
sectors of the economy, as opposed to individual companies. 

For example, NIST researchers recently developed new measure-
ment techniques that cut up to 80 percent of the cost and time for 
industry  to  develop  advanced  materials.  As  one  industry  scientist 
put  it,  ‘‘NIST  scientists  are  re-awakening  a  major  element  of  cre-
ativity  that  analytical  science  almost  lost.’’  NIST  also  operates 
world-class user facilities. Last year, approximately 2,000 research-
ers  from  60  different  industries  leveraged  the  NIST  Center  for 
Neutron  Research  or  the  NCNR.  A  National  Academy  of  Sciences 
report  describes  the  NCNR’s  capability  to  image  an  operating  fuel 
cell  as,  ‘‘A  considerable  achievement,  and  one  of  the  most  signifi-
cant analytical advances in the fuel cell realized in decades.’’ Indus-
try scientists have stated that the research performed at the NCNR 
has  allowed  them  to  jump  5  years  ahead  in  fuel  cell  development. 
To prepare for the future, NIST is working with industry to iden-
tify  critical  measurement  barriers  to  innovation,  evaluating  its 
physical  infrastructure,  forming  new  and  strengthening  existing 
partnerships,  and  updating  the  way  it  stimulates  the  knowledge 
transfer from its labs to industry and academia. 

The  increased  funding  provided  through  the  budget  request  will 
directly  support  innovative  advances  in  broad  sectors  of  the  econ-
omy,  as  well  as  improve  the  safety  and  quality  of  life  for  our  citi-
zens. 

For example, the research initiatives will speed the development, 
and  foster  the  adoption  of  nanotechnology  products,  and  provide 
the  physical  measurements  to  ensure  their  safety,  accelerate  the 
revolutionary  economic  potential,  in  exploiting  the  unique  prop-
erties  of  the  quantum  world,  provide  confidence  and  reduce  uncer-
tainty  in  measurements  supporting  global  climate  change  models, 
reduce  the  risk  to  communities  as  they  encroach  on  hurricane- 
prone  coasts  and  fire-prone  wild  land  urban  interface  regions,  and 
enhance  safety  of  new  and  existing  structures  from  the  cata-
strophic impact of earthquakes. 

To  meet  the  demands  for  measurements  at  ever-smaller  scales, 
at  faster  rates,  and  with  more  accuracy  requires  excellent  labora-
tory  and  user  facilities.  The  budget  request,  therefore,  includes  ca-
pacity  and  capability  improvements  at  both  our  Boulder  campus 
and the NCNR. 

The  budget  request  for  MEP  is  identical  to  last  year’s  request, 
and  is  a  reduction  of  $58.3  million  from  the  2006  enacted.  I  recog-
nize the difference in priority between the Administration and Con-
gress,  regarding  the  Federal  funding  level  for  the  MEP  program. 
One  thing  you  can  be  certain  of,  regardless  of  the  final  appropria-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

30 

tions, NIST will execute the program in the most effective manner 
possible to support the Nation’s small manufacturers. 

No  funds  for  ATP  are  requested  in  the  President’s  2008  budget, 
the  2006  enacted  budget  was  consistent  with  the  phase-out  of  the 
program.  Since  the  2007  Continuing  Resolution,  however,  included 
funding for ATP, we have initiated a new competition. 

In summary, recent NIST measurements and standards research 
have  enabled  innovations  now  embedded  in  the  iPod,  body  armor, 
saving the lives of domestic law enforcement officers and our serv-
ice  men  and  women  overseas,  and  diagnostic  screening  devices  for 
cancer  patients,  making  their  treatment  more  targeted  and  accu-
rate.  The  results  of  NIST  research  can  be  found  in  virtually  every 
manufacturing and service industry. 

For more than a century, NIST research has been critical to our 
Nation’s  competitiveness.  The  increased  funding  requested  for 
NIST will directly support innovations in broad sectors of the econ-
omy that will, quite literally, define the 21st century. 

Thank you, and I would be happy to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Jeffrey follows:] 

STANDARDS

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. WILLIAM A. JEFFREY, DIRECTOR, NATIONAL INSTITUTE 
AND TECHNOLOGY,  TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATION,  U.S. 

OF
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I 
am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  to  present  the  President’s  FY  2008  Budget 
request  for  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST).  This  is  a 
strong  budget  for  NIST  and  it  will  further  enhance  NIST’s  ability  to  support  the 
measurement  and  standards  needs  of  U.S.  industry  and  universities.  The  FY  2008 
request  of  $640.7  million  includes  $594.4  million  for  NIST’s  core  (encompassing 
NIST’s research and facilities) and $46.3 million for the Hollings Manufacturing Ex-
tension  Partnership.  The  budget  for  the  NIST  core  represents  an  11  percent  in-
crease  over  the  President’s  FY  2007  request  and  a  21  percent  increase  over  the  FY 
2007  Continuing  Resolution  (P.L.  110–5).  This  funding  supports  NIST’s  mission  to 
promote  U.S.  innovation  and  industrial  competitiveness  by  advancing  measurement 
science,  standards  and  technology  in  ways  that  enhance  economic  security  and  im-
prove our quality of life. 
NIST’s Impact on Innovation and the Economy 

NIST has a long history of being at the forefront of new innovations through our 
high-impact  measurements  and  standards.  In  2003,  the  National  Academy  of  Engi-
neering identified 20 of the greatest engineering achievements of the 20th century— 
including automobiles, aircraft, lasers, computers, and the Internet. NIST measure-
ments  and  standards  were  integral  to  the  successful  development  and  adoption  of 
virtually  every  one.  Now  NIST  is  paving  the  way  for  the  greatest  achievements  of 
the 21st century which are still yet to be imagined. 

NIST’s  measurement  science  and  standards  form  part  of  the  foundation  upon 
which  innovation  is  built.  Just  as  the  Nation’s  physical  infrastructure  (e.g.,  roads 
or power grid) define the Nation’s capacity to build and transport goods—the Nation 
has  an  innovation  infrastructure  which  defines  the  Nation’s  capacity  to  innovate. 
And  investment  in  long  term  basic  research  like  that  done  at  NIST  is  an  integral 
component  of  the  innovation  infrastructure.  As  stated  in  the  National  Academy  of 
Sciences’ Rising Above the Gathering Storm, ‘‘The power of research is demonstrated 
not only by single innovations but by the ability to create entire new industries.’’ 

NIST  researchers  are  world  leaders  in  their  fields.  They  frequently  arrive  at  the 
‘‘cutting  edge’’  of  science  before  anyone  else.  And  once  there,  they  partner  with  in-
dustry  and  academia  to  identify  and  overcome  barriers  that  can  slow  or  even  halt 
the progress of new innovations. With the proposed FY 2008 budget, NIST will con-
tinue developing the measurement and standards tools that enable U.S. industry to 
maintain and enhance our global economic competitiveness. 

NIST continues to meet the Nation’s highest priorities by focusing on high impact 
research and investing in the capacity and capability of our user facilities and labs. 
This  emphasis  is  validated  by  the  high  rate  of  return  to  the  Nation  that  the  NIST 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

31 

labs  already  have  demonstrated.  Nineteen  retrospective  studies  of  economic  impact 
show that, on average, NIST labs generated a benefit-to-cost ratio of 44:1 to the U.S. 
economy.  The  high  rate  of  return  results  from  the  fact  that  new  measurements  or 
standards  benefit  entire  industries  or  sectors  of  the  economy—as  opposed  to  indi-
vidual companies. 

NIST  supports  U.S.  innovation  and  economic  competitiveness  primarily  through 
its  measurements,  standards,  and  national  user  facilities.  Recent  NIST  successes 
highlight  the  importance  of  each  of  these  critical  components  and  illustrate  how 
NIST’s labs are able to return such a large benefit to the nation: 

Measurements—NIST  researchers  recently  developed  new  measurement  tech-
niques that allow for rapid and cost-effective assessments of advanced materials 
that are used in a range of products from new detergents to improved adhesives 
for  next-generation  electronics.  Previously,  it  could  cost  industry  $20  million  to 
develop and understand the characteristics of one new material. With this NIST 
measurement  advance,  the  cost  and  time  are  estimated  to  have  been  cut  by  80 
percent. To facilitate the transfer of this technique to industry, NIST organized 
an open consortium now consisting of 23 members that are learning to use and 
adapt these new measurement techniques. As a scientist from Honeywell Inter-
national  put  it,  ‘‘. . .  NIST  offers  an  invaluable  resource  to  show  what  can  be 
done, and how to go about it. NIST Combinatorial Methods Center scientists are 
reawakening  a  major  element  of  creativity  that  analytical  science  almost  lost.’’ 
Standards—Nanotechnology  has  the  potential  to  revolutionize  manufacturing. 
And  one  of  the  most  promising  nanomaterials  is  the  carbon  nanotube.  Carbon 
nanotubes  have  unique  electronic  and  mechanical  properties  that  lend  them-
selves  to  a  variety  of  applications,  ranging  from  the  development  of  stronger 
and lighter materials to nanowires and transistors for miniature electronics. Re-
gardless of the potential application, the quality of the materials is paramount. 
Unfortunately,  current  production  techniques  for  carbon  nanotubes  result  in 
products with high levels of uncertainty in their quality and uniformity. To ad-
dress  this  concern,  NIST  is  currently  developing  a  carbon  nanotube  reference 
material. This reference material, when deployed, can be used by any nanotube 
manufacturer to validate their product’s quality, purity, and consistency and ac-
celerate the adoption of carbon nanotubes into more sophisticated devices. 
National  User  Facilities—NIST  operates  world-class  user  facilities  that  benefit 
the entire U.S. research community. Last year, approximately 2,000 researchers 
from  60  different  industries  across  the  country  leveraged  the  NIST  Center  for 
Neutron  Research  (NCNR).  One  recently  developed  application  of  the  NCNR 
was  to  image  the  interior  of  operating  fuel  cells  to  help  improve  the  efficiency 
and durability of these devices. Large and small companies involved in the man-
ufacture or use of hydrogen fuel cells, including General Motors, Daimler-Chrys-
ler,  Dupont,  and  PlugPower,  have  benefited  from  this  new  capability.  The 
NCNR is the premier facility in the world providing this capability. A National 
Academy  of  Sciences  report  describes  the  NIST  efforts  in  regards  to  fuel  cell 
technologies as ‘‘. . . a considerable achievement and one of the most significant 
analytical advances in the membrane fuel cell realized in decades. The NIST fa-
cility offers the entire fuel cell community unique research opportunities that pre-
viously  eluded  them.’’  Industry  scientists  have  stated  that  the  research  per-
formed  at  the  NCNR  has  allowed  them  to  jump  5  years  ahead  in  terms  of  fuel 
cell development. 

The  President  recognized  NIST’s  critical  role  for  the  Nation  as  part  of  the  Amer-
ican  Competitiveness  Initiative  (ACI).  The  ACI  describes  NIST  as:  ‘‘. . .  a  high-le-
verage  Federal  research  agency  that  performs  high-impact  basic  research  and  sup-
ports  the  successful  technical  translation  and  everyday  use  of  economically  signifi-
cant innovations . . .’’ Under the ACI, overall funding for NIST’s core, the National 
Science  Foundation,  and  the  Department  of  Energy’s  Office  of  Science  is  together 
slated to double by 2016. 
Preparing for the Future 

The  21st  century  will  be  defined  by  technology  innovations  that  fundamentally 
change the products and services available, the way they are manufactured and pro-
vided,  and  the  impact  on  our  quality  of  life.  These  advances  will  arise  from  basic 
research  now  beginning  in,  for  example,  nanotechnology,  quantum  science,  and  al-
ternative energies—all areas in which NIST has a strong and increasing focus with 
its investments. 

The  goal  of  increasing  physical  sciences  research  at  NIST  (along  with  that  sup-
ported  by  the  National  Science  Foundation  and  the  Department  of  Energy’s  Office 
of  Science)  provides  a  unique  opportunity  to  strategically  establish  the  programs, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

32 

plans,  and  infrastructure  that  will  more  than  double  the  impact  that  NIST  has  on 
the  economy.  To  prepare  for  the  future,  NIST  is  working  with  industry  to  identify 
critical  measurement  barriers  to  innovation,  evaluating  the  capacity  and  capability 
of  NIST’s  physical  infrastructure,  forming  new  and  strengthening  existing  partner-
ships,  and  updating  the  ways  it  stimulates  the  knowledge  transfer  from  its  labs  to 
industry and academia. 

For  example,  over  the  past  year,  NIST  worked  with  over  1,000  experts  from  in-
dustry and universities to identify measurement barriers to innovation in a number 
of  critical  industry  sectors.  Over  700  technical  barriers  were  identified,  analyzed, 
and  documented  in  a  report.  NIST  is  now  in  the  process  of  working  with  industry, 
universities, and other government agencies to address many of these identified bar-
riers over the coming years. 

In  terms  of  facilities,  NIST  has  conducted  a  rigorous  evaluation  of  its  laboratory 
capacity and capabilities on its Boulder, Colorado, campus. This review found facili-
ties’ shortfalls in our ability to meet both current and projected industry and univer-
sity  needs  in  a  number  of  important  areas.  Examples  include  the  high-speed  and 
high-frequency measurements required for electronics, defense, and homeland secu-
rity;  measurements  and  tests  at  the  single  atom  level;  and  improved  methods  for 
measuring time, an area expected to vastly improve navigation and positioning sys-
tems. Each technical area was evaluated in terms of necessary laboratory conditions 
(to  include  stability  of  temperature,  vibration,  and  humidity,  as  well  as  air  cleanli-
ness).  As  a  result  of  this  assessment,  new  laboratory  space  to  meet  the  Nation’s 
needs well into the 21st century is proposed in the FY 2008 budget (Boulder Build-
ing 1 Extension). 

NIST  also  serves  industry  and  academia  by  being  a  steward  of  world-class  user 
facilities.  As  part  of  the  ACI,  NIST  identified  two  important  opportunities  first 
called  out  in  the  FY  2007  budget  and  enhanced  in  the  FY  2008  budget—increased 
capacity  and  capability  of  the  NIST  Center  for  Neutron  Research  and  creation  of 
the  NIST  Center  for  Nanoscale  Science  and  Technology.  Both  of  these  facilities  are 
designed to stimulate progress in support of our Nation’s economic competitiveness. 
The  ACI  provides  NIST  the  opportunity  to  further  promote  U.S.  innovation  and 
industrial  competitiveness.  With  focused,  world-class  research  and  facilities,  NIST 
will  have  a  greater  impact  on  the  21st  century  economy  than  it  did  even  over  the 
past century. 
FY 2008 President’s Budget 

The increased funding provided through the FY 2008 request will directly support 
innovative  advances  in  broad  sectors  of  the  economy  as  well  as  improve  the  safety 
and quality of life for our citizens. The following table summarizes the proposed FY 
2008  budget.  In  this  table  we  show  both  the  FY  2007  President’s  budget  and  the 
FY  2007  Continuing  Resolution  (P.L.  110–5)  for  comparisons  as  different  baselines. 

Budget Summary Showing Both FY 2007 President’s Request and P.L. 110–5 as Baselines 

[$ million] 

FY 2007 
President’s 

Request 

467.0 
68.0 
535 

46.3 

581.3 

STRS (Labs) 
CRF (Facilities) 
Core Subtotal: 

ITS (MEP + ATP) 

Subtotal: 

TOTAL: 

FY 2007 

Continuing 
Resolution 

(P.L. 110–5) 1 

FY 2008 
President’s 

Request 

Change 

Between FY 
2008 and FY 
2007 Request 

Change 

Between FY 

2008 and 
P.L. 110–5 

432.8 
58.7 
491.4 

183.6 

675.1 

500.5 
93.9 
594.4 

46.3 

640.7 

33.5 
25.9 
59.4 

0 

59.4 

67.7 
35.2 
102.9 

(137.3) 

(34.4) 

1 Totals for FY 2007 do not include the 50 percent of the pay raise that was included in P.L. 110–5. 
The FY 2008 budget was formulated with the FY 2007 President’s request as the 
baseline.  Since  P.L.  110–5  provides  a  smaller  budget  for  the  NIST  core  (STRS  and 
CRF)  than  the  FY  2007  President’s  request  by  $43.6  million,  some  proposed  initia-
tives  in  FY  2007  that  will  not  receive  full  funding  are  implicitly  contained  within 
the  President’s  FY  2008  request.  New  initiatives  and  program  increases  are  de-
scribed in more detail below: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

Scientific and Technical Research Services (STRS) 
Enabling Nanotechnology from Discovery to Manufacture (+$6 million) 

33 

The  potential  market  for  products  containing  nanomaterials  is  estimated  at  over 
$1  trillion  by  2015.  Because  of  their  small  size—a  thousand  times  thinner  than  a 
human  hair—nanoscale  products  require  entirely  novel  ways  to  characterize  their 
physical properties and fully exploit their unique characteristics in the manufacture 
of new products. 

In  FY  2007,  NIST  began  a  major  initiative  to  address  the  measurement  barriers 
hindering rapid development of nanotechnologies. A new NIST Center for Nanoscale 
Science  and  Technology  (CNST)  has  been  established  that  combines  both  research 
and a state-of-the-art nanofabrication and nanometrology user facility. 

The  research  initiatives  proposed  in  FY  2008  will  build  on  recent  NIST  advances 

by: 

• Developing  ways  to  measure  strength,  stress,  strain,  optical,  and  electronic 
properties  of  nanostructures  to  improve  processes  and  understanding  of  failure 
mechanisms; 

• Creating three-dimensional, high-resolution imaging methods that reveal details 
of  structure,  chemical  composition,  and  manufacturing  defects  and  allow  re-
searchers to view nanostructures as they interact with their environment; 

• Simulating nanoscale phenomena with computer models to allow economical de-

velopment of production methods for complex nanodevices; and 

• Producing  the  measurement  techniques  required  to  address  the  interagency  ef-
forts to characterize nanotechnology impacts to our health, safety, and environ-
ment. 

Measurements and Standards for the Climate Change Science Program (+$5 million) 
The climate is changing. Determining how fast it is changing, and understanding 
the complex relationships between all the environmental variables is a critical objec-
tive  of  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program.  Many  different  climate  moni-
toring systems in space, in the air, and on the ground are currently monitoring solar 
output as well as trapped and reflected heat by the Earth’s atmosphere. These sys-
tems  are  operated  by  many  countries  and  research  groups.  Establishment  of  abso-
lute  calibration  and  standard  references  will  allow  accurate  intercomparisons  of 
these  systems,  will  help  identify  small  environmental  changes  occurring  over  many 
years, and will reduce uncertainties in the data input to global climate change mod-
els. 

With  the  proposed  FY  2008  funding,  NIST  will,  working  in  coordination  with 

other agencies, develop: 

• An  international  irradiance  measurement  scale  to  be  used  in  rigorously  cali-
brating satellite light intensity instruments prior to launch to ensure sufficient 
accuracy  to  allow  valid  comparisons  among  results  from  different  instruments 
or from data sets taken over different periods of time; 

• New  instrument  design  strategies  and  quality  assurance  programs  to  optimize 

accuracy and stability of satellite-based irradiance measurement systems; 

• Techniques for generating specific types of aerosols in the laboratory, measuring 
aerosol  optical  and  physical  properties,  and  for  simulating  aerosol  properties 
that cannot yet be measured in the laboratory; and 

• A  database  of  critically  evaluated  data  on  aerosol  properties  collected  at  NIST 

and elsewhere. 

Enabling Innovation Through Quantum Science (+$4 million) 

Unlike the laws of physics that govern our ‘‘every day’’ world, the laws of physics 
that  govern  the  quantum  world  of  atoms,  electrons,  and  light  particles  are  fun-
damentally different. These quantum particles are able to interact in ways that ac-
cording  to  human  experience  would  seem  impossible.  For  example,  a  quantum  par-
ticle can actually be in two different places simultaneously. 

Conceptualizing these phenomena is difficult to say the least, but developing ways 
to exploit them for the development of technologically significant innovations is even 
more  challenging.  NIST,  however,  has  world-class  scientists  who  are  leaders  in  the 
emerging  field  of  quantum  information  science.  Three  NIST  scientists  have  won 
Nobel Prizes in the last 10 years based on their work in this field. Many of the best 
minds  in  physics  today  believe  that  applications  of  quantum  science  will  transform 
the  21st  century  just  as  integrated  circuits  and  classical  electronics  revolutionized 
the 20th century. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

34 

The  proposed  FY  2008  initiative  will  build  upon  NIST’s  significant  expertise  in 
this  area,  and  leverage  the  collaborations  established  in  the  recently  created  Joint 
Quantum Institute between the University of Maryland, NIST, and the National Se-
curity  Agency.  NIST  proposes  to  accelerate  the  potential  of  the  quantum  world  for 
enhancing our Nation’s competitiveness through research into: 

to allow more complex logic operations; 

mation between the components of a simple quantum computer; 

• Quantum ‘‘wires’’ that use ‘‘teleportation’’ techniques to reliably transport infor-
• Quantum memory analogous to the random access memory of today’s computers 
• Quantum conversion processes that transfer information from one form of quan-
tum  information  to  another  (for  example,  ways  to  transfer  information  about 
the quantum characteristics of an atom to a photon); and 
• Quantum  based  measurement  tools  such  as  optical  clocks  and  single  electron 

counters. 

Disaster Resilient Structures and Communities (+$4 million) 

The  past  few  years  have  reminded  us  that  both  natural  hazards—including  ex-
treme  winds,  storm  surge,  wildland  fires,  earthquakes,  and  tsunamis—as  well  as 
terrorist  actions,  are  a  continuing  and  significant  threat  to  U.S.  communities.  The 
disaster  resilience  of  our  physical  infrastructure  and  communities  today  is  deter-
mined  in  large  measure  by  the  building  codes,  standards,  and  practices  used  when 
they  were  built.  Many  of  these  legacy  codes,  standards,  and  practices—which  have 
evolved  over  several  decades—are  oversimplified  and  inconsistent  with  current  risk 
assessments. As construction and rebuilding costs continue to rise, there is increas-
ing recognition of the need to move from response and recovery to proactively identi-
fying and mitigating hazards that pose the greatest threats. 

The proposed FY 2008 initiative will, working in coordination with other agencies, 

develop: 

• Standard  methods  to  predict  losses,  evaluate  disaster  resilience,  and  estimate 
cost-to-benefit  of  risk  management  strategies  at  the  community  and  regional 
scales  that  local  officials  can  use  to  evaluate  and  mitigate  risks  via  land-use 
planning and practices; 
• Decision-support  tools  to  modernize  codes,  standards,  and  practices  consistent 
• A validated ‘‘computational wind tunnel’’ for predicting extreme wind effects on 
• Risk-based storm surge maps for the design of structures in coastal regions. 

structures; and 

with the risk; 

National Earthquake Hazards Reduction (+$3.25 million) 

Many earthquakes strike without warning. Within the U.S., more than 75 million 
people are located in urban areas considered to be of moderate to high risk of earth-
quakes.  Just  the  economic  value  of  the  physical  structures  within  these  regions— 
not  including  the  potential  loss  of  life  and  economic  disruption—is  valued  at  close 
to  $8.6  trillion.  To  address  this  threat  Congress  has  provided  longstanding  support 
for  the  National  Earthquake  Hazards  Reduction  Program  which  NIST  coordinates 
across the Federal Government. 

This initiative will enhance the safety of: 
• New  structures  by  establishing  and  promoting  performance-based  standards  for 
entire  building  designs  and  by  accelerating  the  adoption  of  basic  research  into 
the model building codes, standards, and practices; and 
• Existing  structures  through  research  on  actual  building  performance  in  earth-
quakes;  developing  structural  performance  models  and  tools;  and  establishing 
cost-effective retrofit techniques for existing buildings. 

Construction of Research Facilities (CRF) 
Building  1  Extension  (B1E)—Enabling  Sustained  Scientific  Advancement  and 

Innovation (+$28 million) 

When President Eisenhower dedicated the NIST facilities in Colorado in 1954, no 
one  imagined  that  half  a  century  later  scientists  would  be  manipulating  matter 
atom-by-atom.  Such  technological  advances  require  increasingly  complex  and  dif-
ficult  measurements—to  be  able  to  observe,  characterize,  and  create  structures  at 
ever  smaller  spatial  scales.  As  the  structures  shrink  in  size,  small  fluctuations  in 
temperature,  humidity,  air  quality,  and  vibration  begin  to  distort  the  results.  We 
are now at the point where laboratory conditions are inhibiting further advances in 
some of the most promising areas of research for the 21st century. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

35 

The $28 million proposed in the FY 2008 budget will leverage previously proposed 
funds  ($10.1  million)  in  the  FY  2007  budget  to  construct  state-of-the-art  laboratory 
space  that  will  meet  the  stringent  environmental  conditions  required  for  21st  cen-
tury  scientific  advances.  An  additional  $38.1  million  will  be  needed  in  FY  2009  to 
complete  the  project.  With  a  total  cost  of  $76.2  million,  the  Building  1  Extension 
is  the  most  cost-effective  approach  to  enabling  world-class  measurement  science  in 
support of some of the country’s most important economic sectors. 
NIST Center for Neutron Research (NCNR) Expansion and Reliability Improvements 

(+$19 million) 

The NCNR is widely regarded as the most scientifically-productive and cost-effec-
tive  neutron  facility  in  the  U.S.,  and  serves  more  scientists  and  engineers  than  all 
other  U.S.  facilities  combined.  Neutron  scattering  techniques,  in  which  beams  of 
neutrons are used as probes to see the structure and movements of materials at the 
smallest  scales  are  critical  in  a  wide  range  of  applications  that  will  define  the  21st 
century  including  nanotechnology,  alternative  energies,  and  understanding  the 
structure  of  biological  molecules.  Because  of  the  unique  properties  of  neutrons  for 
probing materials and their applications to some of the most advanced technologies, 
a  significant  shortage  of  neutron  beam  capacity  and  capability  exists  in  the  U.S.  to 
satisfy the demands of industry and academia. 

This  initiative  begun  in  FY  2007  is  the  second-year  of  a  planned  five-year  pro-
gram  to  expand  significantly  the  capacity  and  capabilities  of  the  NCNR.  The  pro-
gram  includes  the  development  of  a  new  neutron  cold  source  together  with  a  new 
hall  to  house  the  guide  tube,  modernization  of  the  control  system,  and  five  new 
world-class  neutron  instruments.  The  specific  FY  2008  funding  will  complete  con-
struction of the new guide hall. 
Industrial Technology Services 
Hollings  Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership  (MEP)  ($46.3  million—no  change 

from FY 2007 President’s request; –$58.3 million from P.L. 110–5) 

The  MEP  program  is  a  partnership  between  the  Federal  Government  and  local 
officials to provide assistance to small and medium sized manufacturers around the 
country. Surveys taken of companies 1 year after receiving MEP assistance indicate 
a significant financial benefit accrued to the individual company. 

The  Federal  Government  is  an  important  partner  in  the  MEP  program.  Specifi-

cally, the Federal Government: 

work; and 

environment and propagates them throughout the network; 

• Develops new services and programs in response to the evolving manufacturing 
• Evaluates  and  ensures  high-quality  performance  of  every  member  of  the  net-
• Ensures that small manufacturers remain the focus of the effort. 
The above Federal role can be accomplished within the requested budget. The re-
duction  of  Federal  funds  to  the  local  centers  may  have  to  be  compensated  through 
a combination of increased fees derived from the benefits accrued by individual com-
panies and cost-savings in the operations of the centers. 
Advanced  Technology  Program  (ATP)  ($0—no  change  from  FY  2007  President’s 

Request) 

No funds for ATP are requested in the President’s FY 2008 budget. The FY 2006 
enacted  budget  and  the  109th  Congress’  House  mark  and  Senate  Appropriations 
committee  mark  were  consistent  with  the  phase-out  of  the  ATP  program.  The  last 
new awards were made in 2004 and sufficient funds were available in the carryover 
to complete all awards and provide government oversight. 

The  FY  2007  Continuing  Resolution  (P.L.  100–5)  includes  funding  for  the  ATP 
program.  NIST  will  work  with  Congress  to  ensure  the  funds  are  executed  in  the 
most effective manner to promote U.S. industry’s competitiveness. 
Summary 

Measurements  and  standards  are  the  bedrock  upon  which  any  economy  stands. 
Our founding fathers recognized this. The Constitution assigns the Federal Govern-
ment  responsibility  to  both  issue  money  and  to  ‘‘fix  the  standards  of  weights  and 
measures.’’ The two are actually more similar than they might seem at first glance. 
All economic transactions rest fundamentally on trust—trust between two parties 
that a given amount of something is worth a given amount of something else. Help-
ing  to  create  that  trust  for  innovative  new  technologies  is  the  common  theme  that 
runs  through  all  of  NIST’s  proposed  FY  2008  research  initiatives.  Each  helps  build 
a  missing  or  inadequate  measurement  base—a  rigorous,  accepted  way  of  quan-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

36 

titatively describing something—that improves confidence in scientific results or im-
proves  the  quality,  reliability  or  safety  of  innovative  products.  Recent  NIST  meas-
urements  and  standards  research  have  enabled  innovations  now  embedded  in  the 
iPod, body armor currently saving the lives of domestic law enforcement officers and 
our service men and women overseas, and in diagnostic screening devices for cancer 
patients  making  their  treatment  more  targeted  and  accurate.  The  results  of  NIST 
research can be found in virtually every manufacturing and service industry. 

For nearly 106 years, NIST research has been critical to our Nation’s current and 
future competitiveness. The increased funding in the President’s FY 2008 budget for 
the  NIST  core  will  directly  support  technological  advances  in  broad  sectors  of  the 
economy  that  will  quite  literally  define  the  21st  century—as  well  as  improve  the 
safety and quality of life for all our citizens. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Dr. Jeffrey. 
Thank you, all of you, I appreciate it. 
I  guess  we’ll  do  a  loose  5-minute  round,  and  try  to,  since  there 

are only three of us here now, see what happens, four of us. 

Each of you has come before the Committee and obviously articu-
lated  what  you  think  you  can  do,  these  programs  are  very  impor-
tant,  and  we  obviously  respect  and  appreciate  what  you’re  doing. 
And we all understand that you have to operate within constraints. 
You’re  the  top  science  standards/research  spokespeople  for  the 
Nation but, as I listen to you say, in a very direct way, and albeit, 
the President’s budget for 2008 has a request of $143 billion for the 
R&D  funding.  Analysis  by  the  American  Association  for  the  Ad-
vancement of Science shows that 58 percent of that budget, $83 bil-
lion,  is  going  to  defense-related  R&D,  $60  billion  or  42  percent  for 
non-defense,  and  the  request  is  very  heavy  on  development,  about 
$82.8 billion totally. 

Even  after  the  proposed  increase  in  the  ACI  agencies,  NSF, 
NIST, DOE Office of Science, funding for basic and applied science 
research  overall  would  fall  2  percent.  R&D  at  NASA  and  ACI 
would, for the new space vehicle, rises, but the request for domestic 
R&D at other agencies would also fall, with cuts of 10.8 percent for 
the  Department  of  Agriculture,  9.5  percent  for  NOAA,  and  a  con-
tinued  decrease  in  R&D  funding  for  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security. 

How do we reconcile this sense that you come in and say, ‘‘Well, 
this  is  overall  increase,’’  in  fact,  here’s  a  chart—I  wish  I  had  it 
blown up, I apologize that I don’t, you can’t really see if from there, 
but  maybe  you  can  see  some  colored  lines.  This  is  2001  here,  you 
see the high line for NIH when we did the doubling, and the trend 
line has been downward since then. These are in inflation-adjusted 
dollars,  now  inflation-adjusted  dollars  are  what  everybody  has  to 
deal  with,  the  reality  of  what  can  you  purchase  and  what  do  you 
get, even though the dollars may go up. 

Likewise  if  you  look  in  other  sectors,  NSF  goes  slightly  up,  and 
down in USDA, and very much down in DoD S&T. The bottom line 
is, we’re not growing in the basic and applied research areas. Isn’t 
that dangerous for our long-term competitiveness? 

Dr. MARBURGER. There’s no question that basic research is a pri-
mary  Federal  obligation,  Federal  role,  and  that  the  ACI  and  simi-
lar initiatives have a focus on basic research. 

Regarding the specific numbers and the details of the budgets for 
this  year,  and  the  budget  behaviors,  there’s  no  question  the  Presi-
dent  has  attempted  to  restrain  spending,  and  within  the  existing 
resources  has  set  priorities  that  do  emphasize  basic  research  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

37 

areas that have been historically underfunded, relative to their im-
portance to—— 

Senator KERRY. Such as what, doctor? 
Dr.  MARBURGER.  Such  as  physical  sciences  and  mathematics, 
computer  sciences,  in  particular,  which  have  been  underfunded 
with  respect  to  some  other  areas  of  science.  And  the  ACI  specifi-
cally calls out these three priority agencies, which have been men-
tioned here today, for special treatment. 

That  is  not  to  say  that  the  other  areas  do  not  also  enjoy  prior-
ities, I believe that the—that the expenditures through the Depart-
ment of Defense are extremely important to maintain our competi-
tiveness in technology, and I also believe that the expenditures for 
things  like  climate  change,  and  environmental  studies,  Earth  ob-
servations  are  extremely  important,  and  this  budget  attempts  to 
identify  priorities  in  those  areas  and  fund  them  at  levels  that 
maintains our leadership in precisely these areas. 

Senator KERRY. If I could just interrupt you for a second. We had 
already  agreed,  Congress  and  the  President,  on  a  NSF  authoriza-
tion  in  2002  that  promised  a  5-year  doubling  effort  by  2007.  In  ef-
fect,  the  2007  request  fell  nearly  $4  billion  short  of  the  previous 
doubling  target.  So  it’s  not  sufficient,  it  seems  to  me,  to  come  in 
and  say,  ‘‘We’re  going  up,’’  when  we’re  actually  not  meeting  the 
goal we set. 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  I  believe  this  budget  does  request  appropriate 
amounts for the National Science Foundation. We would like to see 
us  on  a  doubling  track,  as  the  Initiative  very  clearly  states,  and 
we’re disappointed that—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Why  are  we  not?  What’s  the  precedent  of  pri-

ority, in your judgment, that we’re not doing that? 

Dr. MARBURGER. The—I’m sorry, I don’t understand—— 
Senator  KERRY.  You  said,  ‘‘There  are  priorities  here,  the  reflec-
tion of priorities.’’ Does this reflect the request that you put in? Did 
you ask for the full doubling? 

Dr. MARBURGER. The, the—I’m sorry, the ACI has a doubling for 
these  agencies  over  a  period  of  10  years  on  a  schedule  that  we’ve 
circulated in the policy documents for this Initiative. The President 
has  funded  the  National  Science  Foundation  at  above-inflation 
rates, during the previous several years. Now under the ACI, which 
clearly responds to a number of reports and expert committees and 
advice,  the  President  is  requesting  funding  on  a  doubling  track. 
And that’s, that’s very clear. We’re disappointed that Congress has 
failed  to  enact  the  ACI  through  the  Continuing  Resolution,  falls 
short  by  nearly  a  half  a  billion  dollars,  and  we’d  like  to  get  that 
back on track, and move ahead. 

Senator  KERRY.  What  I’m  trying  to  wrestle  with  here  is  the  dis-
parity  between  the  discussion  about  where  the  priorities  ought  to 
be,  and  then  where  the  funding  is.  Because  the  overall  budget  for 
NSF,  I  can  see,  increases,  that  I  understand.  But,  the  education 
and human resource budget, which seems to be central to the goals 
that we’ve talked about, decreases. I’m trying to figure out how you 
reconcile that. 

Dr. MARBURGER. The President has requested increases for those 
areas in this budget, and we believe that those increases are appro-
priate for the goals and the existing programs within the National 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

38 

Science  Foundation.  We  think  that  it  is  appropriate  for  the  Na-
tional  Science  Foundation  to  have  programs  in  this  area,  and  the 
President  has  requested  funds  for  them,  commensurate  with  the 
aims of those programs. 

Senator KERRY. Well I seem to see here that there’s a NSF Edu-
cation and Human Resource decrease of 5.8 percent, from $797 mil-
lion  in  2007,  down  to  $750  million  in  2008,  despite  the  fact  that 
the President, as you said, is promoting STEM education, and Con-
gress  has  authorized  new  education  programs.  The  money  itself  is 
going down. 

Dr. MARBURGER. My understanding is that the President has re-
quested increases in key programs in the National Science Founda-
tion for these—we have the Director of the National Science Foun-
dation here, he might be able to clarify the details of this. But, the 
President  is  committed  to  improving  both  K  through  12  education, 
and  education  in  other  sectors  that  lead  to  STEM  workforce  in-
creases. 

Senator KERRY. Well, let me ask this—— 
Dr. MARBURGER. Not only through the National Science Founda-
tion,  but  also  through  the  Department  of  Education  as  well,  and 
other appropriate agencies. 

Senator  KERRY.  Dr.  Bement,  maybe  you  can  help  us  here.  Some 
of the most effective programs within NSF, aside from the scientific 
discovery,  are  the  education  and  human  resource  programs,  you’d 
agree with that? 

Dr. BEMENT. Fully agree. 
Senator  KERRY.  And  those  programs  are  specifically  designed  to 
try  to  attract  students  to  science,  technology,  engineering,  mathe-
matics, which we’ve all heard from each of the Senators is a critical 
focus, a priority. 

But  the  2008  budget,  if  you  exclude  the  Experimental  Program 
for  Competitive  Research,  the  EPSCoR  Program,  which  was  trans-
ferred  to  the  Director’s  Office  last  year,  if  you  set  that  aside,  the 
fiscal  year  funding  for  the  core  EHR  Programs  has  declined,  from 
$844  million  to,  a  request  now  of  $750  million.  I’m  trying  to  see 
how you reconcile that. 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Senator,  most  of  that  decline  is  in  one  program, 

that’s the Math and Science Partnership Program—— 

Senator KERRY. And what’s the judgment about that program? 
Dr. BEMENT. I’m sorry? 
Senator  KERRY.  What  is  the  judgment  about  that  program  that 

would bring about a decline? 

Dr. BEMENT. I think the program has been very effective—— 
Senator  KERRY.  Then,  isn’t  that  a  priority,  according  to  what 
we’ve  said,  to  get  more  students  capable  in  math?  The  Chairman 
was  here  a  moment  ago,  he  talked  about  math,  science  perform-
ance, the numbers of engineers, et cetera? 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Well,  since  the  beginning,  the  Math  and  Science 
Partnership Program has been a partnership with the Department 
of  Education,  and  it  was  a  matter  of  judgment  what  that  balance 
should  be  over  time.  The  role  of  the  National  Science  Foundation 
has  been  to  carry  out  research  and  development  in  terms  of  peda-
gogy and instructional materials and so forth, that would meet the 
goals  of  No  Child  Left  Behind,  and  would  stimulate  performance 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

39 

against  those  goals.  And  we  have  demonstrated  that  we  have  im-
proved  performance  in  the  programs  that  we  have  funded,  all  of 
which have been peer-reviewed, they’re all competitive. 

Now,  the  question  is,  in  terms  of  scalability,  and  in  terms  of 
transferability,  in  building  up  the  impact  of  those  programs,  it  re-
quires  resources  well  beyond  what  the  NSF  can  provide,  and  it 
would  be  inappropriate  for  the  NSF  to  do  the  scalability  and  the 
transferability, that ought to be a partnership with the states. And 
we  do  partner  with  the  State  Math  and  Science  Partnership  Pro-
gram,  funded  by  the  Department  of  Education,  so  that’s  been  a 
very  close  partnership,  and  those—those  priorities  have  changed 
over  the  last  4  or  5  years,  the  net  result  has  been  a  decrease  in 
the NSF part of the overall program. 

Dr. MARBURGER. But an increase in the Department of Education 
programs that fund similar STEM-oriented teaching improvements. 

Senator KERRY. Do you know how much, by how much? 
Dr.  MARBURGER.  I  don’t  have  the  details,  I’ll  be  glad  to  provide 

them. 

Senator KERRY. We’ll look forward to, maybe we can—— 
[The information previously referred to follows:] 

Department of Education Funding for the Math and Science Partnerships Program: 

FY 2008 (requested): $182.1 million 
FY 2007: $182.2 million 
FY 2006: $182.2 million 
FY 2005: $179.5 million 
FY 2004: $149.1 million 
FY 2003: $100.3 million 
FY 2002: $12.5 million 

Department of Education Funding for other programs supporting related STEM-ori-
ented  teaching  improvements  at  the  K–12  level  (Math  Now,  Advanced  Placement, 
Adjunct Teachers): 

FY 2008 (requested): $397 million 
FY 2007: $37 million 
FY 2006: $32 million 
FY 2005: $30 million 
FY 2004: $24 million 
FY 2003: $23 million 
FY 2002: $22 million 
Dr. MARBURGER. But, the idea is to continuously increase invest-
ment in No Child Left Behind, and the Math and Science Partner-
ship, in particular. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you. My time is up. 
Senator Sununu? 
Senator SUNUNU. Thank you very much. Let me at least start by 
talking  about  a  very  different  subject—invention.  And,  in  par-
ticular, I want to call your attention to language in the House com-
petitiveness  bill,  and  this  gets  at  one  of  the  concerns  that  I  was 
raising  about  dilution  of  mission  from  investment  in  basic  science 
and mathematics. There is a provision in the House bill that called 
for  research  on  innovation  and  inventiveness.  And,  I  would  like 
each  of  you  just  to  comment  on  how  this  kind  of  initiative  can  be 
defined, and whether or not you think National Science Foundation 
money ought to be carved out for this purpose. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

40 

It  says,  ‘‘In  carrying  out  its  research  programs  on  science  policy, 
and the science of learning, National Science Foundation may sup-
port  research  on  the  process  of  innovation,  and  the  teaching  of  in-
ventiveness.’’  Now,  again,  my  personal  experience  here  is  limited, 
although  I  worked  for  4  years  in  a  manufacturing  capacity  for  a 
gentleman named Dean Kamen, who I honestly believe is the most 
gifted  inventor  I’ve  ever  met.  Dean  has  some  weaknesses,  he  has 
a  very  limited  wardrobe,  for  example,  for  those  that  have  met 
him—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SUNUNU.—but  he  is  a  brilliant  inventor.  He’s  also  a  col-
lege dropout. And, it’s my experience that it’s very difficult to really 
characterize where this gift comes from. And, in fact, the only com-
mon  denominator  I  think  you  can  find  among  great  inventors  is— 
especially  on  the  technology  side—an  interest,  an  interest  in  tech-
nology,  in  science,  in  mathematics.  I  get  back  to  the  basic  concern 
I raised earlier, that that is driven, that’s inspired in 5th grade and 
6th grade and 7th grade and 8th grade, and I know it was in Dean. 
And,  it’s  a  great  concern  to  me  to  start  carving  out  resources  at 
the  National  Science  Foundation  to  try  to  characterize  or  quantify 
the unquantifiable. 

And, I’ll offer one other example, before I ask you each for a com-
ment, and that is, one of the other great inventors of our time, and, 
in a slightly different area of technology, that is, software develop-
ment, is a gentleman named William Gates, some of you may have 
heard of him—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SUNUNU.  He  is  also  a  college  dropout.  Now,  there  are 
some  people,  maybe,  without  a  great  technical  background,  and 
some  people  I  know  with  a  great  technical  background  that  would 
love  to  take  those  data  points,  extrapolate,  and  start  encouraging 
kids  to  drop  out  of  college,  because  that’s  obviously  a  determining 
factor in becoming a great inventor, but that’s not the case. That’s 
obviously not the case. 

The point is, it’s so hard to characterize the gift, but again, both 
of  them—whether  you’re  Bill  Gates  or  Dean  Kamen,  the  key  is  an 
interest  in  technology,  an  interest  in  science,  an  interest  in  what 
makes things work, and that didn’t start when they were freshmen 
in college, just prior to dropping out, it didn’t start when they were 
seniors  in  high  school.  It  started  much  earlier  than  that.  Com-
ments? Dr. Marburger? 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  As  a  matter  of  policy,  we  have  no  complaints 
about,  or  concerns  about  NSF  investing  in  researchers  to  study 
issues like this, about what is it that leads to innovation, we think 
that’s  important.  The  concern  would  be  to,  a  carve-out,  or  some 
limitation  on  NSF’s  ability  to  direct,  or  not  to  direct,  funding  in 
that  area.  We  think  that  the  National  Science  Foundation  does 
support useful research on what it takes to do innovation on social 
sciences  that  are  relevant  to  innovation  and  competitiveness,  but 
we would like not, to see them not constrained to spend a fixed por-
tion  of  their  budget  on  any  area,  but  rather  to  leave  it  up  to  the 
judgment of the community that does the work. 

Dr. BEMENT. Thank you, Senator, for that question. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

41 

Now,  this  is  indeed  a  focus  of  NSF’s  investment  in  education,  to 
teach creativity and innovation through hands-on learning, through 
inquiry-based  learning,  and  also  to  couple  informal  education  with 
formal  education  so  that  children  have  experiences  in  and  outside 
the classroom that stimulate their curiosity and inventiveness. 

I  can  tell  you  that  we’re  seeing  this  now  happen  in  pre-school, 
in  early  grades—I’ve  attended  some  classes  in  6th  grade  where 
they’re  teaching  engineering,  for  example.  And  this  is,  what  I 
think, will stimulate inventiveness. 

We also, through our social science program, are looking at what 
constitutes  creativity  and  inventiveness,  and  that  will  couple  into 
our education programs. 

A  lot  has  to  do  with  cognition,  child  development,  learning  what 
science  children  can  learn  early,  and  also  how  to  evaluate  their 
learning in those subjects. 

Dr.  JEFFREY.  Thank  you.  Obviously,  I  have  nothing  to  add  over 

my two colleagues who I agree with completely, so—— 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you. 
Getting back to the issue of the carve-out, though, and that is my 
principle concern, is that Congress not start directing the National 
Science Foundation where to put its money, how much and in what 
time  sequence.  And  again,  in  the  House  bill  there  are  3.5  percent 
of  the  funds  required  to  go  to  early  career  awards  for  science  and 
engineering researchers. 

I  know  this  is  a  program  that  you  value,  but  not  only  is  there 
a  requirement  that  3.5  percent  go  to  those  career  grants,  but 
there’s  also  1.5  percent  that  has  to  go  to  the  graduate  education 
and  research  grant  program,  there’s  a  minimum  award  size  set  at 
$80,000 for 5 years, would you like to speak to this issue of micro-
management,  and  whether  or  not  the  limitation  on  your  flexibility 
is a cause for concern? 

Dr. BEMENT. Yes, I would, and thank you for that question. 
Prioritization  within  the  Foundation  is  an  organic  process,  it’s  a 
daily  process.  Some  of  our  priorities  are  handed  down  by  the  Con-
gress, by the Administration, and our job is to put together the best 
programs and the best science to address those priorities. 

In  addition  to  that,  we  get  priorities  from  the  community,  in 
terms  of  what  science  is  worthy  of  supporting,  where  the  frontier 
is  moving  forward,  and  in  many  cases,  where  opportunities  far  ex-
ceed  the  available  resources,  they  also  have  to  help  us  in 
prioritizing where those resources go. 

Those  priorities  are  reviewed  by  the  National  Science  Board,  by 
the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  and  by  the  Office  of 
Management and Budget. Along with setting priorities is balancing 
our  program.  Balance  between  support  for  Education  and  Human 
Resources versus Research and Related Activities. Balance between 
support  for  young  investigators  versus  more  senior  investigators. 
Balance  between  instrumentation  and  tools,  and  discovery  re-
search. 

That  balance  can  very  easily  be  upset.  And  when  we  get  carve- 
outs  and  when  we  get  language  that  sets  dollar  amounts  or  dollar 
limits,  it  under-optimizes,  if  you  will,  the  overall  program  at  the 
NSF, and the effectiveness of the overall investment. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

42 

One  final  question,  Dr.  Marburger,  I  mentioned  the  34  different 
Science,  Technology,  Engineering,  and  Math  Programs,  supported 
by  the  National  Science  Foundation,  dozens  of  others  in  different 
parts,  and  at  different  Departments  and  agencies  within  the  Fed-
eral  Government.  There’s  also  a  proposal  in  our  Senate  competi-
tiveness  bill  to  have  the  Department  of  Energy  work  to  establish 
specialty schools for science, math and engineering. Could you com-
ment  on  both  of  these  issues?  One,  what  is  the  Administration’s 
perspective  on  the  number  of  Science,  Technology,  Engineering, 
and Math Programs, education programs, what can be done to bet-
ter  coordinate  their  activities?  And  second,  do  you  think  the  De-
partment  of  Energy  is  the  best  agent  for  working  to  develop  and 
create specialty schools for math and science? 

Dr. MARBURGER. Senator, thank you for the question—there’s no 
question that there are too many of these programs, and they real-
ly  need  to  be  consolidated  and  optimized,  and  the  Administration 
is  beginning  to  do  that  through  a  process  that’s  jointly  sponsored 
by the Office of Management and Budget—— 

Senator  KERRY.  When  you  say  too  many  of  these  programs,  too 

many within various agencies, government-wide? 

Dr. MARBURGER. There are approximately 100 of these programs, 
and multiple programs within each agency and they have not been 
uniformly  assessed  or  coordinated  in  the  past.  And,  we’re  just  be-
ginning to do that. 

This Committee will be pleased to note that the National Science 
Foundation  comes  out  rather  high  on  the  ratings,  they  know  how 
to do these programs and they’re pretty effective. Not every agency 
is set up to do this. Specifically, with respect to the Department of 
Energy, there are assets in the Department of Energy, the National 
Laboratories  are  fascinating  places,  they  provide  mentoring  for 
science  projects  and  so  forth,  teacher  training,  but  I  believe  that 
the  most  important  mission  of  the  Department  of  Energy  is  the 
basic  research  and  the  operation  of  the  facilities  that  they  pro-
vide—these  missions  are  essential  to  the  future  competitiveness 
and  innovation  of  our  Nation,  and  they  need  to  be  funded  more 
than they are today. 

And,  when  it  comes  to  priorities,  that  would  be  our  first  pri-
ority—getting  the  money  back  into  the  Office  of  Science  labora-
tories  and  programs,  and  letting  them  respond  to  the  science  com-
munity regarding the priorities for funding. 

Education would not be my first choice as a function or a mission 
for the Department of Energy. It’s an ancillary function that needs 
to  be  managed  very  carefully  in  the  context  of  their  overall  pro-
gram.  I  believe  that  the  new  programs  that  are  proposed  for  the 
Departments  of  Energy  and  Education  have  the  potential  for  dif-
fusing  any  new  resources  that  we  have  available  to  put  into  that 
agency. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Senator. 
Senator Pryor? 
Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Chairman,  please  let  Senator  Thune  go,  he 
was  here  before  me,  and  I  can  stay  for  a  few  more  minutes,  so 
please let him go. 

Senator THUNE. I thank the gentleman for yielding. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

43 

I’m particularly interested in—our Nation’s energy policy. I come 
from  a  state  that’s  rich  in  renewable  energy  sources  such  as  bio- 
fuels and wind, but it’s not simply a parochial issue for me. I think 
energy  research  and  energy  policy  are  very  much  connected  to  our 
national security, and I guess I would ask whether or not the U.S. 
is doing enough basic research today to get us to energy independ-
ence,  via  clean,  renewable  sources  during  my  lifetime,  and  if  not, 
what more or what else should we be doing. 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  Let  me  just  venture  a  short  response  to  this. 
One of the reasons that we would like to see the budget of the De-
partment  of  Energy  Office  of  Science  increase,  is  that  they  have  a 
lot  to  offer  on  basic  research  for  materials  and  processes  that  feed 
into  energy  independence  and  climate  change  issues.  And  this  is 
why it’s so important to maintain the pace of the President’s Amer-
ican  Competitiveness  Initiative.  Unfortunately,  we  did  not  main-
tain  that  pace  for  the  Department  of  Energy  Office  of  Science  this 
past  year,  and  I  hope  we  can  catch  up  again  this  year.  They  have 
a  very  important  role  to  play  there.  Obviously,  we’re  not  investing 
as much as we should be in that area, the President has requested 
funds to correct that. 

Dr.  BEMENT.  I  would  say  that  more  attention  needs  to  be  given 
to basic research. Certainly the efficiency of solar cells could be im-
proved.  It  may  be  a  point  of  diminishing  return,  but  we’re  seeing 
opportunities for improving their overall effectiveness. 

We’re  seeing  science  being  applied  to  how  to  make  plants  more 
susceptible  to  cellulose  breakdown  for  ethanol  production,  through 
modification.  We’re  also  seeing  breakthroughs  in  fuel  cell  tech-
nology,  where  you  could  begin  to  match  power  cycles,  which  has 
been illusive in the design of fuel cells. 

Energy  is  an  important  enough  area  where  basic  research  from 
more than one agency is critically important. The research that the 
NSF  supports  goes  to  support  graduate  students  at  universities, 
those will be the people who will take that knowledge into the pri-
vate  sector,  and  be  very  innovative  in  taking  new  concepts,  new 
ideas,  and  developing  whole  new  approaches  to  renewable  energy 
generation,  and  energy  sustainability  in  general.  Not  only  how  to 
generate energy, but how to conserve it, as well. 

Dr.  JEFFREY.  If  I  could  just  add  a  few  words  to  that,  of  course, 
there  are  a  number  of  programs,  for  example,  that  are  under  the 
ACI  that  are  very  high  priority.  I  mentioned  in  my  opening  state-
ment,  some  of  the  work  at  the  NIST  Center  for  Neutron  Research 
and  the  impact  that  being  able  to  use  neutrons  to  image  fuel  cells 
have  made  a  huge  increase  in  their  efficiency  and  productivity. 
That’s  a  major  priority  for  us  under  the  ACI  and  we  did  get  ade-
quate  funding  under  the  2007  Continuing  Resolution  to  stay  on 
track on that program. 

Another is supporting a hydrogen fuel initiative, to allow for hy-
drogen to actually be used as a portable fuel. There’s a lot of work 
that  needs  to  be  done  there,  that  we’re  doing  in  conjunction  with 
the  Department  of  Energy,  that  was  not  fully  funded,  unfortu-
nately,  under  the  2007  Continuing  Resolution,  but  again,  we  hope 
to be back on track in 2008. 

I’d  like  to  add  and  follow  up  on  a  thought  of  Dr.  Bement’s,  as 
well,  that  in  addition  to  some  of  the  bio-fuels  work  and  hydrogen 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

44 

work,  there’s  also  energy  reduction  work—how  do  you  actually 
have more efficient lighting? How do you actually have better insu-
lations  to  reduce  the  demand,  as  well  as  to  increase  the  supply  of 
alternative  energies?  These  are  all  areas  that,  I  know,  all  of  the 
agencies mentioned under ACI are heavily involved in. 

Senator THUNE. Well, I just don’t think we can hardly do enough 
in that area. And I know that there have been estimates that there 
is  enough  wind  generated  in  my  State  of  South  Dakota  alone  to 
meet  the  electricity  needs  of  10  percent  of  the  people  in  the  entire 
country. And so, we are obviously very interested in pursuing some 
of those things, but as I said, it’s not a parochial issue, I think it’s 
an  issue  that  has  a  bearing  on  our  energy  independence,  the  en-
ergy needs that we have as a Nation, and the need for good, clean, 
renewable energy. 

Some people might argue there’s probably enough wind in Wash-
ington, D.C. to meet the needs of 10 percent of the people. But, my 
point is, we have to stay ahead in that area, and we have so many 
reasons  for  doing  it.  I  would  appreciate  your  continued  dialogue 
with  us  about  some  of  the  things  that  are  going  on  in  areas  that 
I  see,  as  great  opportunities  for  our  country  in  terms  of  renewable 
energy. 

Mr.  Bement,  I  just—in  your  written  testimony,  you  mentioned 
that  National  Science  Foundation  leads  Federal  agencies  in  fund-
ing research and education activities based on competitive merit re-
view,  with  over  88  percent  of  it’s  research  and  education  funding 
going  to  awards  selected  through  a  competitive  merit-review  proc-
ess. 

We’ve  seen  this  merit-review  process  in  competition,  up  close,  in 
South  Dakota  recently,  there’s  a—as  you  know—an  NSF  selection 
process  ongoing  to  develop  a  deep  underground  science  and  engi-
neering laboratory. A decision on that particular project is due out 
very  soon  and  as  much  as  I’d  like  to,  I  won’t  lobby  you  for  South 
Dakota’s location—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  THUNE.  I  respect  very  much  the  merit-based  and  peer- 
review  process  that  you  use  and  undertake  for  this  project  and  for 
others. 

But, I did want to ask you a question about it, because you men-
tion in your testimony that you want to continue to improve on the 
selection  process  in  2008,  by  enhancing  transparency  and  uni-
formity to the merit-review process. And, I would just ask you what 
types  of  improvements  you’re  considering,  and  how  would  those 
changes impact projects that are currently receiving funding, or al-
ready selected for future funding? 

Dr. BEMENT. I think with regard to transparency, it’s a question 
of  making  sure  that  the  community  knows  well  what  our  criteria 
stand  for  in  merit  review,  and  that  we  have  an  ongoing  dialogue 
so  that  they  meet  those  requirements  in  their  proposals.  We  put 
much  of  that  information  on  the  website,  but  we  have  to  commu-
nicate  it  in  many  more  ways  so  that  there’s  a  clearer  under-
standing of what it takes to be successful. 

We  also  have  what  we  call  NSF  days.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  when 
I  leave  this  hearing,  I’ll  be  going  down  to  Oak  Ridge  to  meet  with 
principal investigators from universities, as well as representatives 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

45 

from the private sector to provide outreach in how to be successful 
in  working  with  the  National  Science  Foundation  through  our 
merit-review process. 

With  regard  to  consistency,  we  need  to  continue  to  work  on  con-
sistency  across  the  Foundation.  Our  program  officers  do  have  the 
responsibility  of  recommending  awards.  Program  officers  from  dif-
ferent  directorates  have  different  viewpoints  on  what  constitutes 
an  outstanding  or  excellent  merit  review.  We  need  to  share  those 
practices  and  that  information  across  the  Foundation  so  that  we 
can lift the quality of our merit review generally. 

Senator THUNE. I appreciate that response. 
And, Mr. Chairman, I thank my colleague from Arkansas for his 

forbearance, and I yield back my time. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Senator Thune. 
Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
If I may, Dr. Marburger, I’d like to start with you and talk about 
nanotechnology. I just have two or three quick questions for you on 
nanotechnology. 

I notice that Nobel Laureate Rick Smalley has talked about how 
nanotechnology  could  enable  a  sustainable  world  of  clean  energy, 
water,  agriculture,  et  cetera.  Do  you  see  nanotechnology  as  an  im-
portant  part  of  the  future  when  it  comes  to  clean  energy  and  the 
environment? 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  Yes,  sir,  Senator.  Nanotechnology  promises  im-
provement of many materials and processes that are related to en-
ergy,  not  only  on  the  energy  conservation  side,  for  example,  in 
making  chemical  reactions  and  the  production  of  chemical  prod-
ucts,  more  efficient,  but  also  in  connection  with  increasing  battery 
storage  capacity,  and  other  characteristics  of  fuel  cell,  primarily 
through  the  materials  enhancements,  and  products  that  use  less 
energy, and use it more efficiently. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK,  great.  Given  that,  do  you  think  that  Con-
gress  should  direct  more  Federal  agencies  to  focus  their  nanotech-
nology resources, if you will, to working on energy, water, et cetera, 
environmental  issues?  Or,  do  you  think  that,  just  allowing  things 
to work the way they are now that the resources will find their way 
to the problems? 

Dr. MARBURGER. Nanotechnology is such a broad field that there 
are  very  many  opportunities  and  it’s  difficult  to  see,  sometimes, 
from which part of this field you will get the results. So, for exam-
ple,  people  working  on  biomass,  are  working  with  molecular-level 
machinery,  that  may  turn  out—serendipitously—to  have  an  influ-
ence on some other application. 

So,  when  it  comes  to  basic  research,  I  favor  letting  the  science 
community  determine  the  direction  and  the  course,  I  don’t  favor 
top-down  direction.  We  try  to  avoid  it  ourselves,  in  the  Executive 
Branch.  This  is  one  area  that  has  such  a  broad  impact  that  we 
want the scientific community to let us know. 

Senator PRYOR. Great, that’s helpful. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

46 

There’s something called the Nanotechnology Environmental and 
Health  Implications  Working  Group,  and  as  I  understand  it,  I 
think  that  you  may  call  it  the  NEHI  Working  Group,  the  NEHI 
Working  Group  is  developing  research  strategy,  with  priorities, 
timelines, budgets, et cetera. When can we expect to have the ben-
efit of that work product? 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  My  understanding  is  that  that’s  a  high-priority 
project,  and  I  don’t  want  to  commit  to  a  time,  because  I  haven’t 
asked  them,  specifically,  where  they  are,  but  my  understanding  is 
that  they’re  working  aggressively  on  this,  and  I  expect  something, 
certainly,  during  this  calendar  year,  and  almost  certainly  well  be-
fore that. 

Senator PRYOR. OK, great. 
Dr. Bement, let me turn to you, if I may, in looking at the geog-
raphy  when  it  comes  to  R&D  and  EPSCoR,  things  like  that,  when 
looking  at  the  map,  the  geography,  I  notice  that  there  are  clusters 
of  research  that  are  done  on  the  East  Coast,  West  Coast,  Upper 
Midwest,  but  there  are  areas  in  the  country  that  don’t  have  much 
of that. 

Is geographical diversity—is that a worthy goal? In other words, 
do  you  think  that  good  ideas  really  don’t  have  any  geographical 
boundaries,  or  do  you  think  it  makes  sense  to  have  them  con-
centrated in certain clusters around the country? 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Absolutely,  I  agree  with  you,  Senator.  There  seems 
to  be  a  misconception  that  all  of  the  talent  in  the  world  exists  in 
a  few,  top  research  universities,  but  one  has  to  keep  in  mind  that 
the  Ph.D.  graduates  from  those  universities  go  elsewhere  in  the 
country  to  teach,  and  many  of  them  go  to  places  in  the  United 
States  where  they  want  to  be  located,  some  want  to  go  to  smaller 
institutions,  because  they  have  more  freedom  and  flexibility.  So 
you’ll find talent broadly distributed throughout the United States. 
And  more  to  the  point  of  your  question,  the  National  Science 
Foundation  could  not  meet  its  obligations  under  the  American 
Competitiveness Initiative without involving every state in the ini-
tiative. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  I  would  welcome  your  thought  on  how  we 
should  have  the  EPSCoR  Program  and  others  to  try  to  improve, 
you know, some sort of geographical diversity—— 

Dr. BEMENT. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.—I  don’t  know  if  you  have  thoughts  today  or  if 

you just want to get back to us. 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Well,  I  do  have  thoughts  today,  I’d  be  glad  to  get 

back with you, and—— 

Senator PRYOR. That’d be great. 
Dr. BEMENT.—discuss it more broadly. 
Senator PRYOR. I’d like to, because that is probably a longer dis-
cussion  than  we  really  have  time  for  today,  but  I’d  love  to  visit 
with you about it. 

The  last  thing  I  have  is  really  a  question  that  in  some  ways  is 
off  the  subject,  but  I  think  is  very  relevant,  and  if  I  may,  Dr.  Jef-
frey, I’ll start with you since I haven’t picked on you yet. The Con-
gress,  once  again,  will  soon  enter  a  discussion  on  immigration  pol-
icy. Before this very distinguished panel leaves, I’d like to get each 
one of your thoughts on things that we need to be looking for when 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

47 

we  are  evaluating  America’s  immigration  policies  and  things  we 
need  to  have  in  our  minds  as  we  listen  to  this  debate.  So,  if  you 
want to start, and if all three could answer. 

Dr. JEFFREY. Thank you very much. I believe that there are defi-
nitely  aspects  of  the  immigration  policy  that  directly  impact  our 
ability  as  a  Nation  to  remain  competitive.  And,  when  you  look  at 
the  history  of  a  lot  of  the  science  within  this  country,  a  lot  of  the 
Nobel  Prize  winners—many  of  these  were  immigrants  coming  into 
this country. 

One of the things for me to be able to do my job at NIST, as well 
as others, we try to bring in the best and the brightest from around 
the  world.  And,  it  would  be  great  to  be  able  to  make  that  an  easy 
access, and to then encourage retention of some of the best and the 
brightest  talent  within  the  United  States,  helping  to  support  mis-
sions that are important to the U.S. 

And,  so  as  the  immigration  debate  goes  forward,  remembering 
the goals, also, of attracting and retaining the best and the bright-
est around the world, I think, is an incredibly important part of our 
competitiveness. 

Dr. BEMENT. Yes, with regard to collaborating with the very best 
scientists around the world, and tapping the best talent for a grad-
uate education in this country, it’s important that we keep the bar-
riers  low,  not  only  for  visas,  but  also  for  immigration.  I  think  that 
expresses my point of view. 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  The  President’s  American  Competitiveness  Ini-
tiative has a specific provision for improving the immigration envi-
ronment  for  highly  trained  people  in  the  technical  areas  that  are 
important for our competitiveness. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Pryor follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

For  the  past  half  century,  the  United  States  investment  in  basic  research  has 
been  the  engine  that  drives  our  economy.  In  1945,  Vannevar  Bush  submitted  his 
report  Science—The  Endless  Frontier  to  President  Franklin  Delano  Roosevelt  that 
spurred  the  creation  of  a  system  of  public  support  for  university  research  that  en-
dures to this day. 

The connection between basic research and the economy is straightforward. Basic 
research  produces  the  discoveries  that  through  innovation  and  manufacturing  be-
come the products that transform and strengthen our economy. 

The goal of basic research is not to publish the most scientific papers, receive the 
most patents, or win awards. The goal is to discover new scientific ideas, principles, 
and  theories.  In  a  global  economy,  with  instantaneous  access  to  information,  the 
United  States  runs  the  risk  of  other  nations  innovating  faster  that  we  do  and  end-
ing up with the ‘‘commercial fruits’’ of our ‘‘scientific labor.’’ 

I support the recommendations of the National Academies report Rising Above the 
Gathering Storm and I am a cosponsor of the America COMPETES Act. I hope that 
this legislation will begin to restore our science research infrastructure and competi-
tive  edge.  At  the  same  time,  I  am  concerned  about  our  ability  to  rapidly  translate 
scientific  discoveries  through  innovation  into  new  commercial  products  and  tech-
nologies. 

I  thank  the  witnesses  for  joining  us  today  and  Senator  Kerry  for  chairing  this 

hearing. 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator,  I  appreciate  it. 
I’m  a  little  pressed  here  because  I  have  to  get  over  to  a  Finance 
Committee  meeting  momentarily,  but  I  want  to  try,  if  I  can,  to 
cover a couple of questions, and see where we are. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

48 

Dr.  Bement,  in  2005,  the  National  Research  Council  of  the  Na-
tional Academy of Sciences issued America’s Lab Report, Investiga-
tions into High School Science. And they found, ‘‘the quality of cur-
rent  laboratory  experience  is  poor  for  most  students,’’  and  then  ‘‘A 
revision  in  lab  activities  would  help  students  to  better  develop 
skills and cultivate an interest in science.’’ It referred to the declin-
ing  condition  of  schools,  and  their  science  facilities.  Can  you  share 
with me what NSF’s response has been to that report? 

Dr.  BEMENT.  We’re  very  favorable  to  the  report,  and  agree  with 
all of the recommendations and findings in the report, and through 
our  programs,  we  try  to  respond  to  that.  Not  only  in  trying  to  up-
grade  laboratories,  but  also  to  provide  training  to  teachers,  and 
how best to teach in the laboratory, to get the best benefit from the 
investment. 

Clearly,  we  can  provide  supplements  to  many  of  our  grants  that 
can  go,  not  only  to  improving  laboratories,  but  also  explore  where 
laboratories can be more cost-effective using modern technology, in-
formation technology for example. 

Senator KERRY. Do you have a specific, or is there a targeted pro-
gram  based  on  that,  that’s  trying  to  really  lift  people’s  focus,  and 
focus energies on it. 

Dr.  BEMENT.  I  don’t  know  that  we  have—we  do  have  one  tar-
geted  program,  and  that’s  the  program  we  call  ITEST,  which  is  to 
bring  information  technology  into  the  classroom.  It  meets  many  of 
the  requirements  that  would  also  be  necessary  for  effective  use  of 
laboratory resources, as well. 

But,  I  guess  I  would  have  to  say,  that’s  the  only  example  I  can 

think of. 

Senator  KERRY.  I’ve  been  in  some  of  these  schools,  and  I’ve  had 
science  teachers  sort  of  point  out  to  me,  you  know,  ‘‘Senator,  it’s 
really  hard  to  do  what  we’re  trying  to  do,  this  is  not  state-of-the- 
art,’’  and  so  forth.  And  I  think  it’s  pretty  tough  to  encourage  kids 
around the country to be serious about science, and think we’re se-
rious,  if  these  are  the  facilities  that  they’re  operating  in.  I  think 
that  your  input  on  this  can  be  particularly  persuasive  to  our  col-
leagues  here  in  terms  of  expenditures  and  otherwise.  I’d  urge  you 
to—— 

Dr. BEMENT. Senator, it does also occur to me that we are work-
ing with the National Governor’s Association in trying to deal with 
some  of  these  issues,  and  most  of  our  Math  and  Science  Partner-
ships deal with this issue in partnership with the states. So, hope-
fully,  as  a  partnership,  we  can  begin  to  address  many  of  these 
issues. It’s certainly high on our agenda, it is something we discuss 
regularly with State officials, and I agree with you entirely, it’s im-
portant. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you. 
Dr.  Jeffrey,  with  respect  to  the  Manufacturing  Extension  Pro-
gram,  everybody  in  the  country  knows  what’s  happened  to  certain 
states,  the  manufacturing  base,  the  jobs.  During  the  period  that 
the Bush Administration has repeatedly tried to cut it, we’ve actu-
ally  used  it  to  add  or  retain  more  than  12,000  manufacturing  jobs 
in Massachusetts alone. 

The Fiscal Year 2008 budget proposes very dramatic cuts to this 
program, from $104 million down to about $46 million. Why, given 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

49 

its  benefits  and  contribution  to  competitiveness  is  it  repeatedly 
under assault? 

Dr. JEFFREY. Well, thank you Senator. 
The  program  we  view  as  an  effective  program,  it’s  a  question  of 
priorities. As mentioned—one of the core priorities that we have is 
increasing the basic science research, which creates new industries, 
supports  new  industries—the  Manufacturing  Extension  Partner-
ship works at a company by company level, it does that effectively. 
We  believe  that  the  Federal  Government,  the  role  that  we  play  in 
that, is really to help ensure that new skills are generated that can 
get  propagated  throughout  the  centers;  that  there’s  a  quality  con-
trol  to  ensure  that  the  centers  operate  effectively;  and  that  there 
is  enough  of  a  focus  that  is  kept  on  a  small  manufacturing  base, 
which is a critical component. 

We  believe  with  the  budget  that  was  proposed,  we  can  do  that 
from  the  Federal  Government.  And  then, 
into  the 
prioritization,  where  the  other  funds  are  necessary,  where  we  be-
lieve  there’s  greater  leverage  from  the  Federal  investment  in  the 
basic science. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  understand  your  drawing  that  distinc-
tion.  But,  I  think  there’s  a  fairly  strong  base  of  support  here,  and 
obviously each year we’ve had a different point of view in the Con-
gress, bipartisanly. 

What  about  with  respect  to  the  Massachusetts  program,  there 
was  a  policy  difference  between  NIST,  you  folks  and  the  IG,  has 
that been resolved, on the audit? 

it  gets 

Dr. JEFFREY. If you’re referring to the 2003 audit—— 
Senator KERRY. Right. 
Dr.  JEFFREY.—that  has  been  resolved,  and  Massachusetts  MEP 

has been notified. 

Senator KERRY. We should be able to proceed forward with that? 
Dr. JEFFREY. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  Great.  Well,  I  appreciate  it.  There  are  a  few 
other  questions,  I  want  to  leave  the  record  open  for  a  couple  of 
weeks,  just  to  follow  up  if  any  colleagues  also  have  questions  or 
weren’t able to be here. 

We  appreciate  it,  I  know  these  are  complicated  budget  times.  I 
might  just  comment  that  there  was  a  revision  on  the  budget  done 
by  CBO  which  suggests  that  we  will  not,  in  fact,  be  in  balance  by 
2012, just for the record so you’re aware of that, we obviously have 
to  operate  within  that.  But,  I  hope  that  we  can  continue  the  co-
operation  which  we’ve  obviously  appreciated.  We  do  consider  these 
entities  that  you  represent  among  the  most  important  in  our  Gov-
ernment, and really vital to our economic future. I know you know 
that,  and  as  a  committee  we  know  that.  We  look  forward  to  work-
ing  with  you,  and  we  appreciate  the  job  you’re  doing  under  obvi-
ously constrained circumstances. 

Thank you for being here today, we stand adjourned. 
Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 11:40 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

DR. WILLIAM A. JEFFREY 

Question. It appears that NIST has been slow to market the user facility to indus-
try. When will the user facility be available to outside users? Will NIST researchers 
help companies improve their nanoscale materials or merely provide a characteriza-
tion  service?  Has  NIST  developed  a  standard  agreement  that  clearly  defines  fees 
and intellectual property ownership? 

Answer.  The  Center  for  Nanoscale  Science  and  Technology  (CNST)  exemplifies 
NIST’s  core  mission  to  promote  U.S.  innovation  and  industrial  competitiveness  by 
advancing  measurement  science,  standards,  and  technology  in  ways  that  enhance 
economic  security  and  improve  our  quality  of  life,  The  CNST  endeavors  to  provide 
science  and  industry  with  the  necessary  measurement  methods,  standards,  and 
technology  to  facilitate  the  development  and  productive  use  of  nanotechnology  from 
discovery to production. In this way, we hope to drive innovation in nanotechnology 
and the related frontier areas of science and technology. 

To achieve this mission, the CNST contains the Nanofab, a state-of-the-art facility 
that provides advanced nanofabrication and measurement instrumentation on a fee- 
based,  shared  use  basis.  It  includes  tools  for  patterning  semiconductor  and  other 
materials  via  photolithographic,  electron  beam,  ion  beam,  or  nanoimprint  litho-
graphic  methods  as  well  optical,  electron,  and  ion  based  measurement  tools.  It  is 
located  in  both  a  16,000  square  foot  clean  room  (which  includes  8,000  square  feet 
of class 100 space) and in an adjacent laboratory building (216) of NIST’s Advanced 
Measurement Laboratory (AML) complex. 

The  CNST  Nanofab  has  recently  opened  to  all  users.  It  currently  has  in  excess 
of 150 internal NIST users who are taking advantage of the state-of-the-art Nanofab 
on  a  fee-based,  shared  use  basis.  CNST  staff  is  actively  reaching  out  to  potential 
external users to facilitate the growth in external use over the next year. The CNST 
staff has created a range of standard agreements that clearly define fees as well as 
issues  related  to  intellectual  property  rights.  Under  at  least  one  of  the  arrange-
ments,  external  users  may  maintain  sole  ownership  of  their  intellectual  property 
rights. 

Finally,  the  CNST  provides  a  flexible  menu  of  services  to  the  external  research 
community,  which  can  be  leveraged  to  best  meet  their  individual  needs.  As  dis-
cussed  above,  external  users  can  have  access  to  the  CNST  Nanofab  user  facility  on 
a  fee-based  shared  use  basis.  This  would  include  access  to  the  Nanofab’s  technical 
staff that can assist the users in taking full advantage of the capabilities of the lab-
oratory  space  and  equipment.  In  addition,  users  can,  if  they  choose,  partner  with 
CNST  researchers  in  joint  research  teams,  focused  on  areas  of  common  interest  re-
lated to improving nanostructures and devices. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

DR. JOHN MARBURGER III 

Question 1. The United States competes with other countries for ideas, talent, and 
resources.  Emerging  economies  are  rapidly  increasing  their  R&D  investment.  As  a 
percentage  of  GDP,  the  U.S.  Federal  investment  in  physical  sciences  and  engineer-
ing  research  has  dropped  by  half  since  1970.  In  2005,  the  U.S.  high  technology  in-
dustries employed 5.6 million people. Starting in 2001 the U.S. has run a high-tech 
trade deficit that continues to widen. 

In many fields, what was once viewed as a linear process of innovation from basic 
research,  through  scale-up,  to  commercialization  is  now  much  more  complex.  Sci-
entific discoveries reported in the literature or patents are instantaneously available 
around the globe. The U.S. needs to be more nimble and faster in translating these 
scientific  ideas  and  discoveries  into  new  products  and  technologies  before  our  com-

(51) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

52 

petitors  do  so.  Do  we  have  a  good  understanding  of  the  innovation  process  and  the 
barriers to innovation? 

Answer.  There  is  a  great  deal  of  on-going  research  aimed  at  gaining  a  better  un-
derstanding of the conditions that foster, drive and enable innovation. Despite some 
progress  in  describing  the  innovation  process  in  limited  areas,  it  remains  a  field  of 
inquiry with a great deal of potential. 

Question 2. What implications would a better understanding of how innovation oc-

curs have on science and technology policy? 

Answer.  Innovation  is  a  hallmark  of  successful  research  and  development  and  a 
trait that should be fostered. If a solid, scientific basis for innovation could be estab-
lished  it  would  allow  us  to  formulate  science  and  technology  policy  with  more  fo-
cused goals and give us tools to better evaluate the outcomes. 

Question 3. What new models, pilot programs, or experiments for accelerating the 
innovation  of  high  risk/high  reward  R&D  would  you  suggest  the  Federal  Govern-
ment try? 

Answer.  An  important  long  term  goal  of  the  American  Competitiveness  Initiative 
is  to  foster  innovation  by  ensuring  that  basic  physical  sciences  are  appropriately 
funded  thereby  increasing  the  chances  that  fundamental  discoveries  will  fuel  inno-
vation.  The  decision  to  undertake  specific  programs  and  experiments  is  best  left  to 
agency leadership in consultation with scientists. 

Question 4. An important aspect of U.S. efforts to maintain and improve economic 
competitiveness  is  maintaining  a  capable  scientific  and  technological  workforce. 
Science and engineering occupations are projected to grow by 21 percent from 2004 
to 2014, compared to a growth of 13 percent in all occupations during the same time 
period. 

The  increased  presence  of  foreign  students  in  graduate  science  and  engineering 
programs  is  a  concern  to  some  in  the  scientific  community.  Enrollment  of  U.S.  citi-
zens  in  graduate  science  and  engineering  programs  has  not  kept  pace  with  that  of 
foreign  students.  Also,  a  significant  number  of  university  faculties  in  the  scientific 
disciplines are foreign, and foreign doctorates are employed in large numbers by in-
dustry.  Do  you  think  the  United  States  should  be  concerned  that  our  universities 
are  educating  foreign  students  who  then  go  back  to  their  home  countries  and  com-
pete with the U.S.? 

Answer. The U.S. system of higher education, the best in the world, will continue 
to attract high quality students from around the world. Some of these students will 
stay in the U.S. after receiving their degree, some will return to their home country 
and  some  will  seek  opportunities  elsewhere.  The  U.S.  should  make  every  effort  to 
retain  the  best  of  these  students  while  accepting  the  fact  that  many  of  them  will 
not stay. Many of those who go elsewhere will use their American education to build 
better trading partners and allies for us. 

Question  5.  Do  you  have  recommendations  for  policy  changes  so  that  the  United 

States can retain the best and brightest foreign students to work in America? 

Answer. The American Competitiveness Initiative recognizes the importance of re-
taining  qualified  foreign  students  with  sections  that  focus  on  education,  workforce 
training and immigration. These complex issues should continue to be addressed by 
Congress and the Administration. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON TO 

DR. JOHN MARBURGER III 

Question.  Please  provide  a  summary  of  the  manner  in  which  the  National  Aero-
nautics Research Policy established pursuant to P.L. 109–155 contributes to and en-
hances the Nation’s competitive posture through an emphasis on basic research. 

Answer. The National Aeronautics Research and Development Policy approved by 
President  Bush  on  December  20,  2006  and  effectuated  by  Executive  Order  13419 
‘‘National  Aeronautics  Research  and  Development’’,  provided  the  Nation  with  the 
overarching  goal  ‘‘to  advance  U.S.  technological  leadership  in  aeronautics  by  fos-
tering  a  vibrant  and  dynamic  aeronautics  R&D  community  that  includes  govern-
ment,  industry,  and  academia.’’  The  Policy  will  contribute  to  U.S.  competitiveness 
by  providing  lasting,  long-term  policy  guidance  to  the  Federal  Government’s  aero-
nautics  R&D  activities  which  will  cultivate  an  R&D  environment  that  enables  a 
globally  competitive  U.S.  aeronautics  enterprise.  Consistent  with  this,  Executive 
Order  13419  states  that  ‘‘continued  progress  in  aeronautics  . . .  is  essential  to 
America’s  economic  success  and  the  protection  of  America’s  security  interests  at 
home  and  around  the  globe.’’  Hence,  both  the  statutory  Policy  and  Executive  Order 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

53 

clearly  recognize  the  link  between  the  Nation’s  interests  and  the  need  for  advanc-
ing—not merely maintaining—its technological leadership in aeronautics. 

The  Policy’s  inclusion  of  basic  research  activities  are  captured  primarily  through 
its  clarification  of  roles  and  responsibilities  of  the  departments  and  agencies  con-
ducting aeronautics R&D in a section devoted to ‘‘stable and long-term foundational 
research’’. While foundational research does consist of basic research, it also encom-
passes  many  aspects  of  applied  research  that  require  continued  long-term  scientific 
study in order to advance a strong technology base in aeronautics that will not only 
benefit Federal departments and agencies, but also the Nation’s broader aeronautics 
enterprise. 

Lastly,  it  should  be  noted  that  the  Policy  does  not  place  an  emphasis  solely  on 
foundational  research.  Of  interest  to  the  topic  of  the  Nation’s  competitive  posture, 
the  Policy  includes  general  guidelines  for  the  interaction  between  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment  and  the  commercial  sector.  The  Policy  also  lays  out  guidelines  to  Federal 
departments and agencies for advanced aircraft systems development and air trans-
portation  management  systems—key  elements  that  will  allow  our  Nation  to  main-
tain its mobility through the air that is vital to economic stability, growth, and secu-
rity. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON TO 

DR. ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR. 

Question 1. Please provide a detailed summary of actions taken by the Foundation 
which would increase its focus on basic research in response to the American Com-
petitiveness Initiative. 

Answer. The American Competitiveness Initiative (ACI) sets out a bold challenge, 
calling  for  expanded  Federal  investment  to  drive  innovation  and  sharpen  the  Na-
tion’s competitive edge. NSF’s investments in research and education encompass all 
of the ACI’s goals. 

For  the  2007  Fiscal  Year  NSF  has  set  priorities  that  will  strengthen  the  science 
and engineering enterprise through investments in frontier research, the workforce, 
education, and cutting-edge research tools. Examples include: 

• Cyberinfrastructure—Cyberinfrastructure  is  likely  to  be  a  key  factor  deter-
mining research excellence for many years to come. NSF has increased funding 
for  cyberinfrastucture  research  and  will  begin  the  acquisition  of  a  leadership- 
class high performance computing (HPC) system optimally configured to enable 
an orderly progression toward petascale level science and engineering computa-
tion  and  data  processing.  This  investment  is  critical  to  NSF’s  multi-year  plan 
to provide and support a world-class computing environment that will make the 
most powerful HPC assets broadly available to the science and engineering com-
munity. 
• Sensors  for  the  Detection  of  Explosives—NSF  is  investing  in  fundamental  re-
search on new technologies for sensors and sensor systems to improve the detec-
tion  of  explosives,  including  Improvised  Explosive  Devises  (IEDs).  Related  re-
search  will  target  advances  in  the  analysis,  interpretation,  and  evaluation  of 
data gathered from sensors, as well as the integration of this data with informa-
tion available from a wide variety of other fields and sensing systems. 
• Advanced  Materials—Fundamental  research  in  advanced  materials  underpins 
competitiveness  across  the  spectrum  of  technologies  on  which  society  depends, 
ranging  from  communications  and  computers  to  medicine,  energy,  transpor-
tation, civil infrastructure, security and national defense. NSF’s advanced mate-
rials investments include new materials in electronics to reduce the need for in-
ternal  cooling  fans,  polymer  gels  to  power  tiny  machines  and  sensors  to  detect 
leaks from hydrogen-fueled vehicles. 

Fiscal  Year  2008  priorities  target  investments  in  concrete  scientific,  engineering, 
and educational challenges of major significance to the Nation and the world. Rapid 
progress  in  these  areas  will  generate  new  concepts  and  tools,  with  far-reaching  ap-
plications, lay the foundation for next-generation tools and technologies, and develop 
educational strategies to engage students and prepare them to excel in a fast-chang-
ing,  global  environment.  One  targeted  investment  is  Cyber-enabled  Discovery  and 
Innovation (CDI). This is a new NSF-wide investment to broaden the Nation’s capa-
bility  for  innovation  by  developing  a  new  generation  of  computationally  based  dis-
covery  concepts  and  tools  to  deal  with  complex,  data-rich,  and  interacting  systems. 
The  rapidly  emerging  world  of  peta-scale  computers,  massive  data  flows,  and  data-
bases  pose  exceptional  challenges  that  require  capabilities  well  beyond  those  avail-
able today. CDI aims to explore radically new concepts, approaches, and tools at the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

54 

intersection of computational and physical or biological worlds to address such chal-
lenges.  New  means  of  computational  discovery  will  augment  the  traditional  dis-
covery-innovation  loop  with  novel  computational  concepts  to  aid  knowledge  dis-
covery,  analysis,  and  experimentation.  This  will  accelerate  the  discovery  of  knowl-
edge  buried  in  massive  datasets,  creation  of  models  to  understand  complex  phe-
nomenon, and understanding of rare events. 

NSF’s commitment to the ACI is further underscored in its Strategic Plan for FY 
2006  to  FY  2011,  which  outlines  key  steps  and  new  investments  at  the  forefront  of 
discovery, learning, and innovation. The four strategic outcome goals established in 
the plan shape the overall investment strategy of the NSF: 

• Discovery—Foster research that will advance the frontiers of knowledge, empha-
sizing  areas  of  greatest  opportunity  and  potential  benefit  and  establishing  the 
Nation as a global leader in fundamental and transformational science and en-
gineering. 

• Learning—Cultivate  a  world-class,  broadly  inclusive  science  and  engineering 

workforce, and expand the scientific literacy of all citizens. 

• Research Infrastructure—Build the Nation’s research capability through critical 
investments  in  advanced  instrumentation,  facilities,  cyberinfrastructure,  and 
experimental tools. 

• Stewardship—Support  excellence  in  science  and  engineering  research  and  edu-

cation through a capable and responsive organization. 

The plan charts an ambitious course for the future, stressing investment opportu-
nities that promise to stimulate innovation, contribute to economic growth, and pro-
vide exceptional returns on America’s investment in frontier research and education. 
Question  2.  Has  the  NSF  undertaken  any  effort  to  better  focus  its  consideration 
of  grants  and  awards  toward  addressing  the  Nation’s  challenges  in  the  fields  of 
science,  technology,  engineering  and  mathematics?  Please  provide  details  of  those 
efforts. 

Answer.  The  cornerstone  of  NSF’s  organic  act  is  ‘‘to  promote  the  progress  of 
science,  the  national  health,  prosperity  and  welfare,  and  to  secure  the  national  de-
fense.’’ The NSF Strategic Plan for FY 2006–2011 views this mission in the context 
of current challenges facing the Nation, and it specifically identifies investment pri-
orities under the agency’s four strategic goals: Discovery, Learning, Research Infra-
structure, and Stewardship. These priorities are based on a range of inputs, includ-
ing Congressional interests, Administration priorities, and interagency initiatives to 
address national needs. These are given further focus through NSB studies, commu-
nity  workshops,  and  NSF’s  budget  formulation  processes.  Current  research  efforts 
address  some  of  the  Nation’s  most  critical  challenges  such  as  nanotechnology,  cli-
mate change, earthquakes, and hazard reduction. 

Question 3. I understand NSF has recently taken steps to enable unsolicited pro-
posals  for  support  of  research  aboard  the  International  Space  Station.  Please  pro-
vide details about this initiative. 

Answer.  NSF  is  part  of  a  task  force  of  seven  Federal  agencies  which  has  devel-
oped  a  strategy  for  using  the  International  Space  Station  National  Laboratory  as 
a  venue  for  further  inspiring  teachers  and  students  in  the  areas  of  science,  tech-
nology,  engineering,  and  mathematics.  The  basic  idea  is  that  young  people  of  the 
Nation  in  various  settings  will  devise  experiments,  talk  with  astronauts,  and  mon-
itor  space  station  events  that  will  inspire  and  educate  them  and  their  teachers 
across  the  country.  The  task  force’s  education  development  concept  looks  at  ways 
to use the Space Station’s U.S. segment to support future projects and develop part-
nerships for education payloads, or experiments, with other Federal agencies. 

Question  4.  The  National  Research  Council  recently,  recommended  that  the  Fed-
eral  Government  establish  a  program  of  Innovation  Inducement  Prizes  similar  to 
the  DARPA  autonomous  vehicle  grand  challenge  or  the  privately  funded  Ansari  X- 
Prize.  Earlier  this  year,  the  National  Academy  of  Engineering  awarded  the  $1  mil-
lion  Grainger  Challenge  Prize  for  Sustainability  to  Professor  Hussam  of  George 
Mason University for an inexpensive, easy to-make system for filtering arsenic from 
well water. 

Designed properly, Innovation Inducement Prizes could be a new way to stimulate 
innovation  on  hard  to  solve  societal  and  technological  problems.  Many  universities 
and  companies  compete  for  these  prizes  and  the  overall  body  of  knowledge  grows. 
Do  you  think  Innovation  Inducement  Prizes  could  be  a  useful  experimental  model 
to try as a pilot program to stimulate innovation on some very specific, hard to solve 
problems? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

55 

Answer.  Not  for  the  NSF.  In  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2006  NSF  awarded  a  grant  to  the 
National Academy of Sciences (NAS) to study the concept of developing an NSF In-
novation  Inducement  Prize.  Discussions  held  by  the  NAS  Board  on  Science,  Tech-
nology, and Economic Policy and Global Affairs were completed in August 2006 with 
a resulting report published in January 2007. 

While  the  report  was  supportive  of  the  concept  of  inducement  prizes  for  applied 
research  and  areas  of  research  that  had  a  clear  target,  the  report  recognized  the 
challenges  of  this  type  of  effort  to  the  NSF  mission  and  traditions.  NSF  focuses  its 
energies on supporting research frontiers of all types and thus supports those people 
who  attack  the  frontiers  of  knowledge.  Moreover,  the  report  concluded  that,  ‘‘the 
agency is seen as working primarily through the competitive award of grants to aca-
demic  scientists  and  engineers  for  self-initiated  proposals  about  how  to  advance 
basic knowledge of natural and social phenomena. It has limited experience in sup-
porting innovations intended to solve societal problems and no experience in admin-
istering innovation prize contests.’’ 

While  the  NAS  report  attempted  to  list  some  possible  candidates  or  targets  for 
a prize, it also recognized the challenge to NSF to initiate the management of such 
an activity. Considering these issues and budgetary constraints, the NSF has elect-
ed not to pursue a prize program. 

Question  5.  If  not  the  NSF,  what  agencies  would  be  best  suited  to  sponsor  and 

manage an Innovation Inducement Prize program? 

Answer. The agencies that might be suited to sponsor and manage an Innovation 
Inducement Prize program would be those in whose domain the specific applied re-
search target area falls, such as defense, energy, or space. 

Question 6. The Rising Above the Gathering Storm report sounded the clarion call 
for the need to improve our graduation numbers in science, technology, engineering, 
and  math  (STEM)  across  all  grade  levels  from  kindergarten  through  graduate 
school.  The  United  States  has  allowed  our  competitive  advantage  to  erode  by  not 
supporting  K  through  college  STEM  education.  In  2003,  U.S.  tenth  graders  ranked 
18th  in  mathematics  and  24th  in  science  out  of  the  30  OECD  countries.  Only  17 
percent  of  U.S.  undergraduate  student  are  studying  science  and  engineering.  The 
comparable numbers for China are 52 percent, South Korea 41 percent, and Taiwan 
38 percent. 

The  America  COMPETES  Act  authorizes  substantial  increase  in  STEM  funding 
at all levels of our education system. This funding must be applied wisely and stra-
tegically.  Has  the  NSF  analyzed  the  STEM  initiatives  in  the  America  COMPETES 
Act  and  do  you  believe  that  these  new  and  bolstered  programs  will  result  in  more 
students  going  into  science,  engineering  and  math  programs  and  a  reversal  in  our 
worldwide rankings? 

Answer. NSF’s programs in education emphasize the importance of recruiting and 
retaining  U.S.  students  into  STEM  fields.  In  accordance  with  the  recommendations 
from the recent report from the Academic Competitiveness Council, we are currently 
working  to  ensure  our  efforts  in  STEM  education  work  in  concert  with  similar  pro-
grams in other agencies and also with those of state and local entities. Key to these 
efforts  will  be  the  development  of  critical  evaluation  tools  so  that  programs  can  be 
assessed and effectiveness measured. 

Question 7. How do we get students interest in STEM? Do we need to change the 
curriculum or how we teach science and math? Are we creating enough scholarships, 
fellowships,  and  young  faculty  research  grants  to  attract  and  retain  the  best  and 
brightest students into these scientific fields? 

Answer.  We  believe  that  improving  the  curriculum  and  reaching  students  at  an 
early  age  in  order  to  encourage  their  interest  in  science,  especially  before  middle 
school,  is  a  promising  strategy  for  attracting  students  to  the  STEM  fields  and  in-
creasing  interest  in  STEM  careers  (Fadigan  &  Hammrich,  2004;  National  Research 
Council, 2007; Tai, Liu, Maltese, & Fan, 2006) There is evidence that a relationship 
exists  between  early  engagement  and  the  pursuit  of  careers  in  science  (e.g,,  Tai  et 
al.,  2006).  Further,  there  is  accumulating  evidence  that  instructional  materials  fo-
cusing  on  experimental  inquiry  rather  than  stressing  fact  memorization  can  create 
and  sustain  interest  in  science  and  mathematics  (see  National  Research  Council, 
2007). 
References 

Fadigan, K.A. and P.L. Hammrich (2004). A longitudinal study of the educational 
and  career  trajectories  of  female  participants  of.  an  urban  informal  science  edu-
cation program. Journal of Research in Science Teaching 41(8): 835–860. 

National  Research  Council.  (2007).  Taking  science  to  school:  Learning  and  teach-
ing  science  in  grades  K–8.  Committee  on  Science  Learning,  Kindergarten  Through 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

56 

Eighth Grade. Richard A. Duschl, Heidi A. Schweingruber, and Andrew W. Shouse, 
Editors.  Board  on  Science  Education,  Center  for  Education.  Division  of  Behavioral 
and Social Sciences and Education. Washington, DC: The National Academies Press. 
Tai,  R.H.,  Liu,  C.Q.,  Maltese,  A.V.,  &  Fan,  X.  (2006).  Planning  early  for  careers 

in science. Science, 312, 1143–1144. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:41 Feb 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\78569.TXT JACKIE

